For those of you looking carefully you can see that I am working on the Headless Dragon here. Yes, I have stitched more of him, but for those of you waiting for a head, you will probably be waiting a long time. I am stitching the pattern clockwise, so the part I am working on now are his rear feet. And after this picture was taken I cleared him away so that I could work on two Fair and Square exchanges. They have both been received, so I can tell you about them in my next post.
Consumers also will benefit in flower prices, Flipse said. “Between buying in bigger volume to negotiate lower prices, we should be able to reduce prices to customers by 10 percent,” he said.
Thus, in the spirit of creative journalism, I take a look at my own work – at my own programmed-from-HTML-scratch website that uses a nonlinear narrative. http://storm.usc.edu/~ristock/CultureClash
Plastic grid sheet
Eating Disorders are serious, life-threatening illnesses – not choices – and it’s important to recognize the pressures, attitudes and behaviors that shape the disorder. Would you recognize if your friend or family member had an eating disorder? Parents, siblings and close friends play a significant role in guiding and supporting someone with an eating disorder. In many cases, individuals with eating disorders cannot recognize a need for help in themselves, and it takes a strong, caring individual to reach out. Most importantly, you need to know that there is hope. For those seeking recovery for a loved one, eating disorder treatment is available.
The DeLarso family has been put in touch with hospice care which as you know is a mountainous expense. In these strained economic times this family could use your help.
We are also on Instagram at @QuinnipiacU.
Calories:
What a lie it is to believe that today is just going to be like every other day. It can’t be with Jesus in it. His “love and life and grace and truth” are going to fill up today making sure that no “today” will be “just like yesterday.” I wonder what we miss because we’ve stopped believing that Jesus will continue to leave us in awe and wonder, even on “just another Monday?”
All in all, yes, I had a very successful race. But that success didn't come without what felt to me like significant struggles. This was a very challenging race for me both mentally and physically. I set more specific and bigger goals than I usually do and I had my first taste of what it's like to really push yourself hard to achieve them. I think I am slowly evolving from just being happy to finish to also wanting to fulfill a few goals along the way. I will always be that runner who is thrilled to just be upright and smiling at the finish line but maybe there's room in there for a bit more than that.
“It’s better with sugar!” She says, stirring. My host family looks at me expectantly.
behind a wall of smoke and flame.
Despite an interest in mechanical things I never took a high school shop class nor any type of engineering or similar college class. However, about ten years after college, I taught myself woodworking and went on to a career building furniture and writing about woodworking topics. My first writing gigs were ... technical and do-it-yourself articles for magazines.
I (not so) secretly hate on 25 year olds who are married, appear to have it all together and live in gorgeous homes. Seriously, how can you afford that designer pad? Did your Daddy pay for it? Are you legitimately that successful 3 years after undergrad? Either way, I'm jealous.
‘Forgetting it is not a good idea’
Although we are not experiencing the full effect of the cyclone the Kruger National Park has had some very heavy rain and the consequences, although damaging are quite spectacular.
5 water chestnuts
Alas, all these things (and more) would be nice. Having a real live person answer the phone when you call your phone company for assistance would be nice too, but those days are gone, for better or for worse. All these things would be nice, but we live in a technological era of continuously improving efficiencies (ie. if a computer can do it, let the computer do it). We also live in a sensitive and litigious era and for a potential employer to provide really honest feedback would open themselves up to human rights lawsuits and poor public relations. This is the era we live in and you can’t change that. But what you can do is live with it and work through it. Besides, if an employer screens you out for any reason that would be a potential human rights issue,or anything that has absolutely nothing to do with your ability to excel in the job, chances are you don’t want to work for that organization anyways.
My boss, the Creative Arts Pastor, asked me each week if each person on the team had played the newer charts. This way we knew exactly how much change each team member was experiencing. I owe him, Frank De Luccio, a lot in learning to consider each person each week.
There was a lovely piece that they filmed with Rachel Marston who is not just wife to Andrew, daughter-in-law to the woman whose family had owned the farm for 100 years, but also mother to three children. She made it clear that farming is not easy, nor will they ever become rich, but it was obvious that she really enjoyed life on the farm, as did her children, both who want to become farmers themselves. She finished with the hope that her own children will be 'hefted' to the farm.
My mind just starts to go crazy waiting. We are sitting in a bare house, that needs to be cleaned for our move out. I was messing around with the blog, trying to keep my mind from thinking too much (if you know what I mean) and I came across the organic sister. I have read on her site before and have seen her post on Unschooling Families on the Road (I think) and I would love to meet them some day. BUT Tara's post this morning made me want to freak out.
Something about immigration This has gotten way too emotional - if they are illegal - send them home. If they're not - then treat them as if they were citizens of the U.S.A. It's not that hard. Sure there are lots of ramifications. If you send the illegals home, it will have an impact of prices. If you don't send them home, you basically saying - It's OK to exploit them as cheap labor. If your saying make them all citizens, I'd ask who the hell is going to pay for it? And if you say - the government I'm going to smack you upside the head with a 2x4. California tried that - they're bankrupt.
Another me exists somewhere
Worcester Sorcerer, Sadler's Ales.
Cutter and Work Rotation Data
Dr. Rudolph Tanzi is a Professor of Neurology and holder of the Joseph P. and Rose F. Kennedy Endowed Chair in Neurology and Mental Retardation at Harvard University.
I hope all the kids had as much fun as I did. Plenty of smiles and no tears would suggest so.
For example, it might be a company trying to decide whether to launch a new product or expand into a new market; a private equity company trying to decide whether to acquire a company; a very brief description of a company’s business model (no financial figures) where you have to advise them why their profits are declining. For strategy consulting, the problem may be expressed in a purely descriptive way – no detailed figures, tables or graphs to pore over, just a statement of the fundamental problem.
The most creative assault on Spencer must be Richard L. Schoenwald’s psychological autopsy in the 1968 summer issue of the esteemed journal Victorian Studies, in which the historian reveals that Spencer’s twisted and deformed worldview stemmed from his fascination with feces.
Tell her to crawl on all fours like a dog
If, on the other hand, you want barrels whose extractives have mostly been depleted, then you want barrels from very well-aged bourbons, like Pappy, Elijah Craig 18, or the BT Antiques.
It was a wonderful 2011. I’ve enjoyed filling this blog with various subjects – reading your comments and sharing my insights. I offer a heartfelt hug to everyone who has taken the time to peruse my articles as well as visit my official website and online store. But this contest is dedicated to the individuals who are either new or have followed this blog since its early inception. In short…this contest is for my subscribers. But first, let’s take a quick look at 2011 as it relates to the contest.
Grandfather, Bo Yibo — Helped lead Mao’s forces to victory, only to be purged in the 1966-76 Cultural Revolution. Subsequently rehabilitated.
Having the kids be photosensitive is an interesting twist and really made for some cool, inventive visual touchstones – like how Grace has to close all the windows and doors to make sure the sun doesn’t creep in accidentally. One scene in the beginning shows this quite well – after telling Anne to leave the room to study by herself, Grace has to first tell Bertha to close the windows in the adjoining room to keep her daughter safe. This plot point wasn’t entirely necessary to move the story forward, but the fact that it is there adds another layer of complexity and weight to the plot, upping the ante on the danger present in a very peculiar and unique way. The fog constantly surrounding the house is great, too, always looking ominous and ghostly, setting the stage with a real atmosphere.
I snagged my favourite seat. Bang in the middle of the back row. What luck! The aisle feeds up to it meaning plenty of legroom. No one behind, no one in front. Perfect.
I’ve been speculating about the issue because I had to write an English essay for the first time in well over thirty years and my God, were my sentences mangled. Everything I’ve learned through writing fiction was forgotten in an instant and I was once more an intense, swotty teenager, constructing sentences of labyrinthine complexity, laying sub-clause on sub-clause, periphrasis on qualification, until the whole inelegant edifice collapsed under its own weight.
with the theme “digital, mobile
The sad part of this journey to attain mind-body synchronization is that it is implicitly flawed by human hubris. Man’s character flaw of ego hides from man the manner in which Jiriki, salvation from within, can be attained. It is for this reason that one who desires to embrace Jiriki Kata-Do, inner salvation from Kata, must abandon and surrender human hubris.
Obama has recently promised 10 billion of our tax dollars to Brazil, in order to give them a leg-up in expanding their offshore oil fields. Obama’s largesse towards Brazil came shortly after his political financial backer, George Soros, invested heavily in Brazilian oil (Pet rob ras).
I still believe in the standard of care that most midwives provide for low-risk, uncomplicated pregnancies and births. I do believe that when I started bleeding at 15 weeks, the midwife should have bowed out of my care. I do believe that when I was sure my water broke at 18 weeks, she should have bowed out of my care. I don't blame midwives in general. I'm not even sure I blame her specifically. I should have spoken up. I should have insisted on an ultrasound. I should have asked for a second opinion. I didn't. At the least, we share blame. At the most, as his mother, the blame falls on me for not protecting him.
Here are some pictures for your enjoyment! Taken during Christmas of 2009!
Earlier this year when us girls went to Mabula for a week of chilling and scrapping we came across this old yellow bus at a little farm stall, and being committed scrappers we could not pass up the opportunity for a photo (ok more than a photo).
“Shit, I’m in New Guinea now… damn, that means my watch is going to be off. Oh wait…”
It was a fun vacation.
This Spring Break, I was fortunate enough to have my Hubby home from work for the whole week. Having this luxury gave our family the chance to spend more time together and take several trips in the local area. One of the places we chose was Jockey Hollow in Morristown, NJ. A historical place that housed the troops of George Washington from 1779 to 1780. It is a vast area, full of trails, soldier hut replicas, knotty trees, brush and many other interesting things. There is something so very peaceful about the woods…even with a bunch of kids running around. I just love to get re-energized walking through it. There is something so special to me, being in the woods. (Just don’t ask me to sleep there overnight.)
While Nicholas tries to figure away to rescue Sacha's head from a life of ghoulish servitude, the Baron and Otto are down in the lab trying get their walking corpses to mate with one another. Repeatedly instructing his female zombie to kiss his male zombie, the Baron grows increasingly frustrated by the male zombie's lack of arousal after each command to "kiss him" fails to bare any erectile fruit. Unaware that Sacha's brain is not wired for sex, the Baron starts to loose it. Blaming everything from the blood they used to outside agitators, the Baron is determined to get his zombies to procreate, as it's his dream to create a race of superior beings with Serbian noses.
Pearls : Melissa Frances
Here is some of the amazing things the DT have come up with for you to get some inspiration from......
So if you’ve been following the rollercoaster ride of GSC Game World and their follow up PC title, S.T.A.L.K.E.R. 2 then I’m afraid after a long battle, things have fallen apart for this developer. It was confirmed yesterday that the anticipated sequel has been cancelled and the studio itself shut down.
I have been busy making invitations for a Birthday Lunch for my Dad who will be 80 in November.
In other news, I was walking passed a shop the other day with my gran when she saw this dog hat type thingy in the window. She asked me how ridiculous it was...
In my seemingly never-ending quest to find the best, most user-friendly, flexible, non-annoying, and free collaborative workspace in which to share ideas and data with a particular large research team, I recently set up some trial workspaces using various platforms. I didn't want to send out invitations to the entire group until I decided which, if any, we would be using, so I only added one guinea-pig colleague, just to test things out.
may the fluency of the ocean be yours,
Eleven years on my wardrobe screams with clashing shades of hot pink, black, white, light blue, light green, and is peppered with short skirts, shorts, barely there t-shirts and flimsy linen blouses. That is because it is mostly very hot here.
Gert here. Now that Pilgrim has been FOUND OUT, he/she/it has NO CHOICE but to come clean, except we know that it’s already been all ‘created’ before hand; there really isn’t any real Brian.
New, punitive and potentially invasive laws such as the London Olympic Games Act 2006 are in force. This legitimise the use of force, potentially by private security companies, to proscribe Occupy-style protests. They also allow Olympic security personnel to deal forcibly with the display of any commercial material that is deemed to challenge the complete management of London as a "clean city" to be branded for the global TV audience wholly by prime corporate sponsors (including McDonald’s, Visa and Dow Chemical).
3/4 C brown sugar
Everything.
Please read on for this talented designer’s input on design…
Roy DeCarava (1 gelatin silver print, 1952)
First, the anchor chart of expectations:
And I bought yarn to knit this . . .
The result of years of research, Masters of Command is based on surviving written documents and archeological evidence as well as the author’s travels in Italy, France, Greece, Turkey, and Tunisia in the footsteps of Alexander, Hannibal, and Caesar.Learn more about the book and author at Barry Strauss's website.
Wounded by Love, you did nothing to defend yourself
Ha, HA! See, I talked about the cultural impact of the electronic forum. It makes people impatient… impatient with stuff like reading! Death of the novel—yada, yada. I talked about it before.
How did y’all do?
After a veeeeeeeeery long conversation, Loser Ex-Boyfriend and I have decided to do a "break" on the whole friendship. Meaning that we won't be speaking to each other for a while. It's my own personal strike in life.
On a normal note, can you believe I am going to buy this?
Congrats Ladies!!!
But, “We remain cautious about pronouncing a turnaround until we observe a couple more quarters of improvement,” said Reis. “As we have observed in the recent past, two consecutive quarters of improvement are not necessarily the beginning of a trend and are insufficient to declare that a recovery is underway.”
The Royal troops aren't up to much, but are no worse than the Rebels, so don't really merit being Hordes. They use a mix of swords and shields, and polearms, so you could have some Spears if you wanted. Blades seems the best all-round classification, though. The Artillery represents various fanciful weapons employed against Pulgasari, including fireball-hurling catapults, rocket batteries and some amazingly impractical cannon. A magical priestess was also used in an attempt to defeat the monster.
What am I going to write about?
This is Tangerine Tango Glitter. This was the main reason I wanted this set. I had never really seen a glitter this color before. This has orange and coppery glitters that give it amazing dimension. This polish just glows! I can't wait to wear it as a pedi once I have a tan. haha This polish started out thin, but the longer it was open the thicker it became. But that 's pretty normal for a glitter. Below is 3 coats.
According to this reliable hadith, the cursing of a Muslim constitutes moral depravity. When any Muslim dares to curse another Muslim, this amounts to moral depravity – all the more so when it is done by a scholar, who is considered by some to be a source of authority in Islamic law. He dares to curse, to slander, to make unfounded accusations, and to sanction the killing, execution, and stoning of people. He uses black incitement against a Muslim. This is the height of moral depravity.
wasabi for coating
For those who don’t know much about salsa, it translates to “sauce” and its origins trace back as far as the Aztec civilization! Thanks to it’s fresh and healthy ingredients, salsa replaced ketchup as the top selling condiment in North America in 1997.
Another thing worth noting...aside from affirmative action bonus points, the president was the grandson of a bank president who raised him and paid his fees at the exclusive Punahou School in Hawaii..and Michelle Obama's father was a well connected Democrat ward leader, with all that entails.
I have weceived a few wetters fwom some school childwen adwessed to Mr. Bush's Neighborhood. I would wike to wead a few of them to all of Amewica. I hope some of those mean old Democwats are watching, because they might wearn something about Pwesidenting.
And this has got me thinking about other similar small talk that Westerners find uncouth.
Chopped coriander leaves
Play amongst yourselves, I'm heading back to Sunnydale.
Let cookies cool on pans for several minutes before transferring to wire racks to finish cooling. They are a little crumbly when hot, but they are no longer crumbly when cool.
I haven’t given up on us.
14 Blackboard Sky
I got the tape measure out a few days ago and slipped it around my waist. It was an inch and a half smaller than when I started yoga. I was so excited. I know that is a huge accomplishment.
finding yet-earlier numbers
Next to be profiled was an enigmatic and often moody, yet spectacular Frenchman who had only one moment of glory to show for his 200+ events in the sport, Jean Alesi.
The support actors, in particular Shreyas Talpade and Arjun Rampal are well cast in their roles. Being a Farah Khan film, of course the songs are exceptionally well choreographed and filmed. One of the things we appreciate Farah for is her determination that her leading men should be objectified as much as, if not a little more than, the glamorous heroines. She outdoes herself with Dard-e-Disco which has hilariously bad lyrics (apparently she kept telling Javed Akhtar to make his lyrics worse) and is full of gratuitous shots of SRK in, emerging from, and being doused with, water.
It all started well enough. I decided that instead of just sitting at the table eating green beans and rolls while everyone else told me how wonderful the turkey tasted, I'd go ahead and make myself a mock turkey out of tofu. I found a recipe, made a grocery list, and almost bought all of it.
Since it's going to freeze tonight, our neighbors picked all the oranges from their tree and brought us two big bags full!! Logan squeezed them for dinner........So delicious!
I wonder who made it all rhyme though? Did they brief the MC?
Please excuse my excitement. I received an email from ParenThots that I have won the last best parenting story this April. The announcement of the winning is HERE. I have apply leave to collect the prize this Friday afternoon, and will take Princess for a walk around either Bandar Utama or IKEA after that.
“DAP is nothing more than a political eunuch to PAS,” Dr Chua said.
In this sweet and spicy romance tale, Grace Emerson is a woman torn apart by an ex-fiance but determined to move forward with her life. Even when he starts dating (and soon proposes) to her younger sister. If she didn’t love her baby sister so much, she might actually be mad. Instead, she licks her wounds privately and forges onward… by making up an imaginary doctor boyfriend to keep her family quiet. Makes sense.
Then you see something like this happen. And you kinda step back and think about how racism rolls off your back. Like water in a thunderstorm. And it’s only when something like this happens that you get soaked. Although you’ve been walking in the storm your whole life.
note: in the picture I am sporting one of my new designs, the Painted Peacock scarve (100% silk, Made in Holland) to be launched at the New York International Gift Fair in August
Here is what I know about the Make Life Better Transformation!
You know, one day he’s gonna be asking for my fucking autograph. And you know what I’m gonna say when he does?
You always have the upper hand
People have noticed the same eerie disconnect from the suffering of the populace as Barack and Michelle Obama party on. There has been a succession of vacations topped off by Michelle in Spain on the U.S. dime. Keeping track of the vacations, about seventeen this year, has become a media pastime.
"SO HE CAN COME HOME TO A PEACEFUL HOUSE!"
I'm blogging from my hotel room in London where I've had my first hot shower in 5 days. I feel like I just slathered myself in liquid heaven.
that the church was ultimately responsible for the demise of his building,
I’ll let you guess. Guessed? Good.
States that considered versions of the legislation this year included New Hampshire where lawmakers effectively killed a bill as they heeded warnings that blocking public funding to abortion providers could jeopardize New Hampshire’s Medicaid program.
And then there’s the moment when it all stops. Its like pressing the button that has a warning sign hung over it. Or like entering the garden that says “beware of the dog”. Sometimes you just gotta beat the odds and see how you turn up around the end. You realize that many people including society, people, extended family, friends expect you to live a certain way. A way that they would approve of. A way that pleases them. It wouldn’t bring them real happiness but it would leave them guiltless yet content. So when you stop walking on the sidelines and take a detour to the destination you think you belong to or transform yourself to the person you want to be. The one that really makes YOUR heart happy, you don’t see a lot of takers. You don’t even find many standing by your side at the end of the journey. You din’t fit the bill. You can’t be a part of the group coz you’re now an extrovert not an introvert. You can’t get trodden to the ground. You won’t take everyone’s bullshit and hide it in your heart but you will give an equally tough fight. Maybe tougher. You won’t run to that emo corner and cry it off and emerge like you rose from the dead- So now, this confident, outgoing self is not acceptable.
I’ve never owned a cat, but from what I’ve observed they do their thing and let you think you own them. They deign to grace you with their presence, and you’re supposed to be grateful. And that obviously works for cats and their owners.
7 Junk Yard Dawg 3:35
Well, there you have it! Remember ... be sure to pop on over to my 'partner in crime's blog' ... BLEST WITH STAMPS ... and see what Lana did with her yellow painted framed mirror!
But what if the Appellants argued (and the specification supported) that the process could also be performed on a computer?
Everyday it has become a routine and must-do to check on every single one of these social networking sites to somehow catch up to what is everybody is doing for the past 6 hours you have been asleep. Personally, I go over Facebook, Twitter, Google+ and Tumblr and scroll up and down, click on links, read, comment, like, circle, hangout, reblog, retweet, share, email, troll and all the things possible of what social media has offered us today.
The Just Magnolia Blog is promoting Breast Cancer Awareness month through their challenge which is: Think Pink! I embrace this and wanted to make a pink card. I used the Friday Sketchers for it. The challenge at Magnolia-licious Highlites Challenge Blog is to use a recipe or food element in the card. I've put a recipe inside the card but wasn't able to take a picture because the weather is strange today and I cannot find the good light to take pictures...
Hell’s Corner by David Baldacci (audio)
He did! They lived! Pharaoh let them go. They left in haste as predicted.
I won't say on here how much weight I am trying to lose. Most of you who know me in persona already have a good idea. But I will say what I have lost as I start to see progress. I am really excited about feeling better, being more healthy, looking better and being a better example for Hannah.
I got asked to speak in church for Mother's day today,
Dedicated To You But You Weren't Listening (2:32)
So many good friends (one who has been with me through it all)
During the cooking demo, Chef Stefano prepared 3 dishes for us to try - Artichokes Frittata, Seafood Risotto and Milk Risotto with Cherry Parfait. I enjoyed them all, but my favorites has to be both the risotto dishes as I have a soft spot for risotto.
What we are approximating here is how many copies do you need to sell to earn out your advance? When you get that number, you’ll probably have a really good idea what the editor will offer when she calls.
People today wrongly pray for the outpouring of the Holy Spirit as they say the disciples did in the upper room. But I tell you the disciples were not praying for the outpouring of the Holy Spirit. They knew what was expected of them and I am sure they were seeking wisdom as to how to go about replacing Judas and preparing themselves for the great ministry that had been given to them.
As a parent of two children myself, as a wife, and as a daughter of a cancer survivor, I could not simply just leave my "facebook words of support" and be done with it. Mark and his family are in for a long, tough road ahead and I think we all should chip in and help. I am appealing to the Atheist community, especially, since we are always accused of being "sinful" and "immoral" without "god" in our lives, but I am also appealing to all the human beings out there who know that we are one human family and that by helping eachother, even if that other person is a stranger, we are, in essence, making this world a better place for ourselves and for our children especially.
8) spindle
I have a full weekend booked, starting today:
Now, it doesn’t take much to connect-the-dots here and figure out that these actions could seriously endanger not only the lives and well being of the officers involved, but their families and homes as well. One has to wonder too, what might be the percentage of Catholic officers and families placed in harms way by this foul act.
Suzzanne Uhland earned a Bachelor of Arts with distinction and a Master of Arts at Stanford University. A Phi Beta Kappa Society member, she received her Juris Doctor at Yale Law School, where she acted as Co-Editor in Chief of The Yale Journal on Regulation. Frequently requested as a speaker, the entrepreneurial attorney has addressed the American Bankruptcy Institute, the Financial Lawyers Conference, and other professional organizations and forums on such topics as “Post-GM Chapter 11: Is Nothing Sacred?” and “Treatment of Intellectual Property Licenses in Bankruptcy.” Ms. Uhland also shared her expertise as an Adjunct Professor at Southwestern Law School in Los Angeles, where she educated students on secured transactions.
And how much does scrumpy sell for at the farm gate in the West Country nowadays? Indeed, does the farmer even know how strong it is? If it’s 8%, a pint will cost £1.82, which I suspect is rather more than the current price.
She kept going … and zoom she went off closing the gate without putting on her tudung.
Repair & Maintenance
When I was young, my aunt and uncle would take me "antiquing" with them and we would find an assortment of treasures along the way. I loved finding something cool that had been discarded. I'm a firm believe in "one man's trash is another man's treasure." Recently, a friend borrowed our trailer to remove some old junk from his basement. I had the opportunity to do a little digging through his "trash" on the hunt for some treasures. Of course, I had this challenge in mind and I was so hoping to find something I could use. I was not to be disappointed! In fact, you'll see a few more items I found over the course of this month.
To sum it all up, I believe that every writer/director/cinematographer should watch this prank which turned into a viral video ad campaign for TNT.
Pug: I actually go between Chambers, Jesus Calling and Worship the King devotionals as a place to begin. Then, I love reading from Psalm to enter into a personal time of worship and prayer.
What gets you going in the morning?
The chicken arrived already quartered; there was a huge plate of chips and just for healthy balance a huge plate of salad. The chicken was cooked to perfection with an unknown (to us) variety of spices. The chips were perfectly browned and even the salad was a good mix. (Usually here they overdo the onion and under do the lettuce). All this was washed down with a fine Malbec.
Isn't she just the cutest little thing you've ever seen?
Are the prices higher? Yeah, and you're paying for monthly cell service and your internet connection; CHU is free. Rather do that? There are places you can't get cell signal; okay, there are still places that have crap selections. It's not a perfect analogy!
KA VOUROKEFTES 16
Mary Saenz, has a nimble memory. It is a Queen Anne cup, and based on the engraver, materials, and the fact that it does not have a lid, she agreed that the trophy could have been circa 1983 for Bates Motel. The stories lined up. I am such a super Nancy Drew sleuth. What is more strange, is that I was actually at that race. I am sure I didn't win a dime. So, things do have a perfect way of finding their way into your home. Thank You for the Christmas money Mom!! I had a ball agonizing and spending.
Probably the best thing she taught me
you were a night that never ended ..
I totally spaced last Friday.
This Tip & Trick is the easiest of the easy. And IHeart 3M Command Hooks because they are simple to install, and remove, leaving no permanent effect to any wall or surface that they lived on.
Sure, the sets are overlit (every frame of Season 24 was overlit – why change things for this story?). Yes, the cliffhanger gag at the end of episode one is not just ghastly, but one of the dumbest moments ever, in all of Doctor Who. True, the bulk of the Iceworld sets are never even remotely convincing, not for a second (though Kane's lair is effective enough). The less said about the appearance of the “Dragon,” the better. And I will never in a million years understand what they were going for with the C-subplot of that irritating little girl and her mother, a strand which fails on every level, but especially at being cute. Melanie. Yep, “Dragonfire” has its fair share of McCoy-era fuck-ups, and yet they somehow never really overpower the stronger aspects of the story.
(18) John McCloskey, Coadjutor of New York
Hi
We thought that jobs were good and that our organizations were designed to compete. I certainly thought that and I was a SVP HR for a very large bank.
Well anyway I left soon after and changed my major to pottery.
The consequence I came up with for Gil's recent behavior is a 7 o'clock bedtime. Did I mention he does not like that? At all? At first I wasn't going to let him read in bed, but it's pretty hard to declare LIGHTS OUT! when, well, it's still light out.
Our people are increasingly suspicious or even frightened by the actions of their own government. It can no longer be trusted to do what’s right by them. It seems to be driven by agendas that have nothing to do with their interests or well-being. In such circumstances, an independent judiciary becomes more important. It’s a bulwark against tyranny. No wonder its reputation is under attack through ill-informed and self-serving comments by politicians and the appointment of questionable characters to the bench.
I have read through the Internet and came out with some conclusions. Firstly, all films are manipulative on some level but the way they handle it is how you distinguish whether they are subtle or heavy-handed. Now these two words are pretty ambiguous and they are rather the absolute so I think it is safe to say that no film is fully subtle or no film is fully heavy-handed. In fact, a lot of films, good or bad, is a mix and mash of both and it can be quite indiscernible most of the time. There are, however, films and cartoons that lean heavily towards each spectrum and I will try to give some examples below.
And then there was the wind! The picture above shows the backyard of our son after the storm. That heavy propane grill was blown over — it took two of us to put it back. If you look carefully at the picture above (it can be enlarged), you’ll see the leg of a chair that went through their fence. It was later reported that a tornado touched down a couple of miles from their house — I’m glad we didn’t know about that at the time!
12: Godzilla vs The Cloverfield Monster, who wins?
“ David can defeat Goliath … all it takes is courage ’ – Geert Wilders
“I don’t know. What is it?” asked Bantum trying to think of what “times” might mean.
I passed by recently, and found the bar, which was founded in 1969, had been supplanted by a cheery-looking place with the cheery name of Skylark.
It’s interesting to see what dates a television show, at the time you might have guessed the clothes, or the cars maybe. Probably not the cigarettes.
I am currently obsessed with finding an entry table for a big blank wall we have near our front door. It needs something, and I have faith that that something is going to be a table like this one , which I found on the Meijer website (must have drawers!).
There were times where I was frustrated to tears--and a bloody nose-- giving up and threading my way to freedom with my hands outstretched to prevent further injury. Since those days, I have seen halls of mirrors in traveling carnivals, but none were as large and complicated as P.O.P.'s. None had the distracting, dizzying lights that lent a sense of spaciousness and multiplied like a field of supernovas against the glass. Once inside, you banged endlessly against your likenesses, trapped in a world of a thousand yous!
I am SUPER EXCITED that we booked our first family vacation. Chris and I haven't been on vaca together since our honeymoon (nearly 8 years ago!) We are both pretty excited. Any suggestions and tips for taking little ones to the beach would be greatly appreciated :)
ED was 20 when she discovered she was pregnant with Little Buddha.
Wolf Moon
"Amen! Sorry for the let down: I'm no Edward or Jake. Love you, Ryan"
In Phuket, the scope of complaints also includes jet ski operators who threaten tourists if they object to paying for damage incurred during the rental period, despite the island’s insurance scheme.
The Bush Conspiracy Theory is a Lie. If neither flight was in the air as American Airlines itself has so stated, then numerous ‘official versions’ of the ‘official conspiracy theory’ are but a pack of malicious lies. There is, then, probable cause to indict Bush and his co-conspirators for the crimes of mass murder and high treason. See: U. S. Codes, Title 18, Section 2441. That includes every statement made by Bush.
I added another stripe of ribbon, tic-rack, or other trim to each flag, following the line of the bias tape. Again, I used scraps I had in my trim box - another 8-9 yards total.
No. They didn’t. But it wasn’t them who had driven him to the rooftop with his prized weapon of death in his hand. It was everything else.
2.Licenses
In fact, a salad this good far outshines the name "taco" salad. After all, there's no lunch lady ice cream scoop of ground beef. No deep friend shell. No crumbled Fritos or cheddar cheese. Oh no. While those ingredients usually make other taco salads palatable, they would do nothing but disgrace the mere existence of this salad.
06/14 – Houston, TX @ Warehouse Live (Studio)
2 shoot
passed a thousand sensations
Of flowers that have ambitions to be little lampshades or a chandelier?
Here is Nancy, our cute hedgehog lady! Nancy will be released as a digi very soon, but she's not the very next release we'll have. The next release will be a design to be introduced by Kellie Winnell, and I'll let her do all the talking when it comes to it. There'll be another giveaway at which to try your luck --that much I'll say! ;D
What scientific evidence would you point to to show that God created the universe OR that God fine-tuned the universe, or parts of the universe, for intelligent life?
Q is is lying in the middle of my bed, half on top of the socks, chewing and shredding them, and making goofy ummm-mum-mum-mumuGRRRRUMmm-mum-mummmmm..... HISSSSUMNUMNUMNUMNUMMM-Mum-mum-mum-mum-mum-mum noises.
Among European luxury goods companies, Salvatore Ferragamo Fashions is a renowned company. The Italian based company is famous for having been the creators of fashionable shoes, women’s and men’s ready-to-wear, and a host of other leather items. The Ferragamo Group is under the umbrella of Salvatore Ferragamo Italia S.p.A., and Salvatore Ferragamo Fashions is also renowned for the watches and eyewear they license to other retailers.
She traveled with us and with friends and she did get to see so many of the places she wanted to see.
He has won 6 Grammy Awards, an Academy Award, a Golden Globe Award, and a Tony Award.
1-2 eggs
Hal Jordan as the Spectre- It sucked, people hated it, it went away.
I watched the entire game and loved it-- I tried to keep in mind what time it was and that I had neighbors in my apartment complex. Wow-- what a close game at the end!!
He’s not a star pupil, but he’s pretty good. He’s not the most diligent of swots, and needs to be told to make his bed or tidy his room. But amazingly, although he occasionally issues me with warnings not to embarrass him (I know, what a spoilsport!), he still seems to like spending some of his time with us.
I have two cards to show you today, but I separated them into two posts.
5. Place half of the rice mixture into the casserole dish, cover the bottom of the dish and up the sides, pressing it firmly into a bottom layer. Layer in the meat mixture and sprinkle mozzarella on top (saving some to sprinkle on top). Top with the remaining rice mixture and spread it until even. Top with the remaining tomato sauce, bread crumbs and cheese.
You know… boom towns don’t last forever.
In May 2005, the Central Bank published its ‘Fit and Proper’ Guideline (sic) and that document can be found at http://www.central-bank.org.tt/news/releases/2005/mr050510.pdf. It is a critical part of this discourse since it sets out the official position as to the type of person held to be ‘fit and proper’ to be a Director or Officer of a Financial Institution.
Do not drink
help me, is there really
. Storyboard
And, if the weekend hasn’t been too nice to you and you didn’t catch that fish, it is an opportunity to throw the line in again. Let’s face it; the people around you are in the same situation aren’t they?
Today the kids cut or tore colorful tissue paper and glued them to their heart-shaped boxes ($0.99 each at my local craft store). I took them home today and Mod Podged them to seal and make them shiny...Tomorrow, the kids will pick out letters to spell M-O-M (or M-A-M-I or G-R-A-N-N-Y, depending on their own special person's name) from my collection of small foam letter stickers to decorate the top. They will also decorate a bag to 'wrap' it in. And voila, Happy Mother's Day! I think they'll be super cute when they're done.
Her meaning now was clear to see
We wear the babies on our bodies in Bjorns, Moby's, or slings, as we did with A. She is a tiny three-year-old, so a month ago, I asked her if she wanted to ride in the Ergo carrier on my back, since she was feeling jealous that O-Bear was in the Bjorn, next to me. She climbed in and I wore her on my back while I made cookies. She laid her sweet blonde head onto my back and said, "Ahhh. Isn't it nice to be stuck together like glue again, Mommy?" MELT.
I was satisfied when one student said, "Man, we do everything- car wash, christmas chicken dinner, now football in the rain!" And I expected some repirmand from the principal, as we sat musty and excited during the 2nd quarter awards ceremony for the last hour of the day.
I was pleasantly surprised to find the quality of items such as fruits and meat to be just what I would have picked. The bananas aren't too ripe and the clementines look fine. I got everything on my order and there were no surprises, since the website offers 3-D close ups of all things you buy, so I knew which brands and how much of everything I was getting.
Parts of the country are already drier than they were in the summer of 1976, when Britain experienced its worst drought for more than 100 years. Then water shortages led to standpipes being installed on residential streets, water supplies to businesses being rationed and schools having to close early.
*As usual I use 1/2 white, 1/2 whole wheat flour.
report released last month,
Understanding this, the researchers then could draw some conclusions about why scientific consensus seems to fail to settle public policy debates when the subject is relevant to cultural positions.
"Hey Marc!"
KUALA LUMPUR: There is no logic in Suaram’s claim that Prime Minister Najib Tun Razak sought US$1 billion (RM3 billion) for a meeting between French company DCNI and him in 2001 for the Scorpene submarine deal.
Do you remember the toilet bowl man? Well if you do, can you tell me; do you report his wages on a 1099 and does he fall under the Obama healthcare coverage? Seems mine is complaining about his working environment and I want to make sure I have achieved my legal obligations.
If you are a woman, and you hold Friedrich Nietzsche in high esteem as one of the great enlightened thinkers of modern philosophy, there is a decent chance you might be unfamiliar with the full extent of the man’s musings about the fairer sex. Since his own lifetime, the philosopher has been accused of promoting misogynistic ideas in his writings, due to his tendency of abrasively referring to women—and femininity as a whole—in largely hostile terms (as we shall explore shortly). However, it should be stated for the sake of objectivity, that this sentiment is not universally accepted amongst prominent female authors and thinkers, as some of these individuals interpret Nietzsche’s apparently sexist aphorisms as a rhetorical strategy, used to illustrate the vain construct men have of women, and the potential to possibly move beyond this simplistic sentiment.[1] Whether any of these more favorable interpretations are viable positions in light of Nietzsche’s own words, or simply attempts to exonerate the philosopher of the charge of misogyny, is the focus of the analysis that follows below. Although Nietzsche never wrote a single cumulative work on the topic of womanhood, his books are nevertheless filled with countless critiques and examinations of the female psych, thereby making it possible for the reader to gather a coherent impression of the philosopher’s views on women, and gender relations in general.
Finally, the answer to the burning question of the ages: just how did the seven Gilligan’s Island castaways end up on the Minnow together anyway? Why would a millionaire couple be taking a three-hour tour on such a boat in the first place, let alone with a farm girl, a professor, and a movie star?
That said, I don’t overly fret dating a story. I don’t think you can write convincing contemporary settings without occasionally taking that risk.
In a short sale, a lender agrees to accept less than the amount owed on a property and release its lien.
This is an android tablet that is 1 in . wide touch screen.This allows intended for a very clear observing of docs and images in addition to videos. This tab is run on the android mobile phone 2 tablet froyo.This means that you’ll have access to the android operating system market. This android market place lets somebody tone for you to download applications from the 1000′s that are available around the android current market. Of course, don’t assume all the apps are going to be good for you however it is imperative that you opt for the ones which are likely to solve your daily needs. Restrictions by Bing and your own storage capacity will also hamper the endeavours to store as many applications as you possibly can. The loss also enables one to engage in adobe Flash 1 video clips. The hard computer has 8 gb of storage and one may use the bill for nine hours not for stop. There is also a HDMI productivity.
When your boyfriend or potential boyfriend is an MD, all the more will a girl’s Nancy Drew side act up. An MD is exposed to guests of all colors, shapes and sizes. It’s not unlikely that an MD will be tempted to cheat on his partner. Hence, researching in this case could be a girlfriend’s defense mechanism.
BOYCOTT AMERICAN WOMEN!
I'm pretty excited about some of the things I have to show you - but I haven't had a chance to take pictures of anything yet...hopefully, I'll have something new on here by Tuesday at the latest. (please try not to lose sleep until then)
What is your favorite social media tool and why? Twitter! It’s an amazing tool where you are able to chat with people that you normally would never be able to chat with in real life. You also encounter headlines that you might have never seen if you didn’t hop on Twitter and scan over the timeline when you did!
“Why…why? I came to you last Saturday and you threw my feelings back in my face.”
Some of my friends think they look rather slutty
The start was quite unceremonious, no real count down, just an air horn and someone telling us loudly to go. Everyone seemed a bit shocked for a second before we were off.
an aunt,
That’s the simple thesis, and I’m not getting into a “what is art” debate.
I am a preschool teacher for Toddlers. I have a class full of 2 year olds and in addition to making the children feel safe and loved, I have to plan curriculum on a monthly basis to help develop important skills. The following is a list of activities I’ve applied to my classroom which can be used by teachers and parents alike!
The story line is straightforward and simple and the newlyweds in real life Riteish Deshmukh and Genelia D’Souza do form an endearing pair on screen as well. Genelia scores simply by underplaying her ebullience. Well suited for the role of the gutsy, bindaas female lead requirement, she has successfully overcome the temptation to display her teeth in every scene of the movie. It may still require her more time and effort to match the histrionics of what Kareena Kapoor managed to achieve in the portrayal of a similar character in JAB WE MET, but if she works on her dialogue delivery and attempting more changes to her facial expressions depending on the requirement of the scene, she will certainly leave a mark.
The projectionist's records have revealed that over the years this has become one of the most frequently shown films in the screening room of The White House.
Check out this guitar song at age what? 17?
A participant from India, Hussain Mudavoor, was upbeat about the timing and holding of the international meet and praised King Abdullah and the MWL for organizing the conference.
Besides, we all know that Imopup is mucho better than the current cur that pretends to be a leader taking yet another exhausting vacation.
charter schools start at the entry level around 35K. Furthermore,
nude and excited
LS: I do visual styling and production work for top-notch commercial clients. You can see some of the beautiful images I've helped create at my website.
And needless to say, this magazine is filled to the brim with beautiful photography--
This is for my dear readers. I will be away from home and from the computer. I will return sometime at the end of the month.
Natx
“What do you mean Penfold?”
It just so happened that the idea of dissociative disorders were just beginning to be formed by psychologists in the late 1800s. Starting in the 1880s, to be more exact. Prior to this, these types of episodes as RLS describes in Jekyll and Hyde would have been attributed to demon possession, but psychologists were just realizing that traumatic events in life could cause long-term disorders. It was into this intellectual field that Jekyll and Hyde sprang, and it changed the way psychology looked at dissociative identity disorders.
Since my first competition, I have learned a lot of important lessons, but there is still a lot for me to learn. I am very grateful to have been given amazing modeling opportunities and work with and compete alongside some of the top fitness pros in the industry.
Blessed be the Lord our God, for our sister, the printed word, food for the intellect and light for the soul. R
All of the arrests occurred without incident and there were no injuries.
Of course, as with all of John Waters' early films, it's the gorgeous Mink Stole who shines the brightest. Playing Dawn's fourteen year old daughter, Taffy Davenport, the sexy Mink repeatedly makes Meryl Streep look like a dishevelled whore through her unblinking industriousness.
Then there are Ronnie’s gigs and Kathy’s family and a Wyoming grandson getting married this summer. It’s all good.
This is a unique album, wedged between the previous ‘Glam-esque’ releases (although to be fair, Big Beat was starting to head towards a more American sound), and prior to their full blown move to the Euro Electronic sound. By the mid 70’s, Sparks were pretty big all over Europe (particularly in Britain), and the band were keen to make inroads in their own backyard, so this album was to take on the US market – even the title seems geared to their prospective new audience, although knowing their wicked sense of humour, it was more likely just a piss take title for their seventh album! I asked Russell and Ron to spill the beans on how they ended up with it, they told me “We just felt it a propos to title our 7th album Introducing Sparks. Most bands don't name their 7th album 'introducing'. That's probably what appealed to us. In fact, most bands don't even have a 7th album!”.
It is the day loved by couples...hated by singles...and a day created by florists....ones that want you to have an excuse to buy overpriced flowers. I wasn’t going to let it get me down. Today was a typical Monday.
Coke or Pepsi? Coke, even though I don’t drink it often. Pepsi is the devil’s work.
14. Changes to the law of this kind should not be driven by public opinion but by serious informed debate. Public opinion polls can be easily manipulated when high media profile (and often celebrity-driven) ‘hard cases’ are used to elicit emotional reflex responses without consideration of the strong arguments against legalisation.
Verdict: Surprisingly delicious. The agave and celery harmonize beautifully. It even tastes, bizarrely, a tiny bit sweet. Take the celery tequila, pair it with lime, St. Germain and a little Lillet Blanc and you have...
What is the proper response to betrayal? Or even the natural response? Jonas’ mother shuns her son but, for many, there will be the often kneejerk response to pay the person back: an eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth and infidelity for infidelity. So they go out and screw the guy’s best friend or the first person they meet in a bar. And that’s what happens here. Not the best friend, the bar. When Eva finds out exactly what (or, to be more precise, who) her husband has been doing she goes out, picks up a guy in a bar, goes back to his flat and lets him have his way with her.
Ahhhh, summer break is here! Oh, how I have longed for summer and now that it is 90+ degrees outside I'm not quite sure why I was so excited. Sweating as soon as you walk out of the door isn't exactly my idea of fun, however not having to get up before Mr. Sun and going to work is definitely worth it. I think. Unfortunately, I am working summer school so my vacation is a little shorter but half days are better than nothing!
First-remove three of the bottles
Ok, well, let me try to at least fulfill some of the award requirements..lol
The only thing I take comfort from is the fact that there are no more missing pills from the med carts. The right people are getting the right meds at the right time.
So what is World Book Day all about? Here is a description from UNESCO:
Well, I have to run. I’m heading out to the Canadian Breast Cancer Foundation’s Yard Sale for the Cure Media Challenge in a few minutes! You can read my teammate Christine’s post about it here.
Copenhagen
Charming landscaping… Flanked by a community mosque on one side and the Karachi residence of the Sheikh of Abu Dhabi on the other, Hilal Park stretches over a hillock. The landscape design, which makes exceptional use of the topography, is the highlight of the Park. A brick path, edged with immaculately pruned topiaries weaves through well-maintained, exotically shaped flower beds, up a hill, and over culverts and wooden bridges that span over the narrow ravines in the rock formations.
Do you have any Natural Flea and Tick remedies you have tried? How have they worked for you? Share with us and let us know.
Putna came to kill Krsna by poisoning her nipples before breast feeding krsna. Since Krsna drank her milk though poisoned, He gave her the position of his mother such is Krsna’s character.
A white community in 1950’s Chicago frets about the African-American family about to move in. Fast-forward to the present day, and the same house represents very different demographics.
Another thing I loved that she said is, "I'm really concerned about the little things. We haven't been asked to cross the plains, but I have asked you not to chew gum and yet some of you are still doing it. We've asked you to wear skirts that cover your knees when you are sitting and yet some of you still have skirts that are too short. I'm worried that if we can't do the little things we don't have a chance when we're asked to do the big things." I thought that was really profound.
I don't really believe in or doing New Year's resolution. But I've decided this year - in honor of Jessie, I will make one. I am TRULY going to try and not sweat the small stuff. And no matter what trials our family faces in 2012, we will try to live by Jessie's creed to NEGU!!!
The only message I have ever given people I love, is stay safe.
Day 1, Oct 24. Multicolored tweed jacket, don't remember. Pink, cowl-neck shell, New York and Company. Brown, cuffed pants, Victoria's Secret. Pink chandelier earrings, Claire's. I will have to check the tag on this jacket for the brand. It is one of my favorites because it matches my favorite colors and it is very warm. It cost far more than any other blazer I own, but it was worth it!
“The Hood is like Batman’s Arkham City. Hugo Strange is running the NYPD, everyone rolls together like a gang and Batman, oh my bad…The Hood doesn’t have a Batman.”
Never anything that suggests an actual meeting took place and the writer certainly didn’t take the photo.
Monday was so nice. I got up later than I had on the trip, but earlier than usual for me. I lazed around all day, catching up on tv shows that I had missed while I was gone, and catching up on a few things online. It was so nice to have air conditioning, electricity, my computer, my phone, and my bed. All things that I missed on the trip.
I took Hypnobirthing classes. Did I believe they'd work? I had my doubts. See, I have serious issues with my baby's father. No partner to rely on. A rocky relationship with my mother who is my birth partner by proxy, bless her, and who is dealing with some serious bullshit at home with my teenage siblings, bless them. (The first 'bless' was sincere, the second was conflicted.) Aaaand a tendency to list reasons I can't accomplish stuff.
Maybe it's a problem with me, maybe I have no soul, but I don’t hate animals. I’ve had pets. I’ve watched them lick their balls and I’ve cleaned up their period from the lino (“Oooh she’s in season! How adorable!”) and called them a cunt when they’ve farted on me and I’ve thought to myself that they have got a pretty good deal. If I could shit in the garden and get away with it I would. If I could fart in the back of someone’s car and have everyone in stitches then I WOULD. But I can’t. Because I’m not a dog. And a dog is not a fucking person.
Cardiologist and author
It was introduced to Japan in the 4th and 5th century.
But hey-ho! Everyone has their quiet days right? Oooo! I completely forgot that I had the new Alexander McCall Smith book to read so I will be visiting Mma Ramotswe in Botswana sometime today also! Very much looking forward to that.
"Since Anne Waldman gathered 31 poets at the very first marathon on January 2, 1974, countless forward-facing luminaries have thrown their voices into the cauldron — among them Eric Bogosian, William S. Burroughs, Spalding Gray, Jackson Mac Low, Ed Sanders, Pedro Pietri, Helen Adam, John Cage, Joe Ceravolo, John Giorno, Ted Berrigan, Yoko Ono, Amiri Baraka, Gordon Matta Clark, Jim Carroll, Bernadette Mayer, Alice Notley, Steve Cannon, Hannah Weiner, Kathy Acker, Arthur Russell, Gerard Malanga, Suzanne Vega, Allen Ginsberg, Patti Smith, and Philip Glass. The list grows every year, as does the roster small press publishers and local restaurants who donate deliciousness in the form of astounding books, journals and food. We’re not so secretly in love with them all — and with the 75 selfless volunteers too who keep the Marathon running.
What the hell,I am a smoker and still got a fireplace.
To conclude: I'm sorry: but once again the New York Times is turning the reality of the issue upside-down.
The pleasure is when you finish your day ride, and reach in one piece. You the smaller vehicle on the road, and you survived.
Donkey Kong Country 3 (GBA)
which I'm not.
The chipotle chicken taco comes with black bean relish, fresco, tomatilla salsa and chipotle sauce and there's plenty of flavour in the shroom taco, a mix of wild mushrooms with pickled enoki, shredded red cabbage, queso fresco cheese, avocado salsa and chipotle sauce.
couple of handfuls of popcorn
I'm in California right now because my agent, Janet Grant at Books and Such is hosting a retreat for her authors. It's going to be a great few days of networking with some amazing authors and learning from the informative workshops she's arranged.
The fact that it’s almost Cinco de Mayo got me thinking about, well, of all things, Cinco de Mayo. In high school I lived about two hours north of the Mexican border in West Covina, California. Being a suburb of L.A., there were a number of easy access attractions available to young people including Disneyland, Knott’s Berry Farm (amazing pies and fried chicken), the famed Southern California beaches where I spent most of my summers, the San Diego Zoo and Tijuana, or T.J. as we referred to it.
He also pointed out that Nazri had yet to look into allegations that the Attorney-General’s Chambers had dropped its RM40 million corruption case against former Malacca Chief Minister Tan Sri Abdul Rahim Thamby Chik in exchange for him stepping down from all government and party positions.
The chart follows my usual format of using only three colours so it should be quick and easy to stitch. I think it would look nice on almost any coloured fabric - and would look very striking on a dark colour!
That the lives of these old fellows we see on television, and whose names we now know, go back more than a century, touches us - and it may add to the power they project for us that they are not especially heroic and do not represent themselves that way. That they do not posture or make use of any of the rhetorical cliches, but are modest survivors of the ordinary circumstances and perils of living. And that on television, where glamorisation is almost a given, so that any claim they might once have had to youthful beauty is simply irrelevant. Very young people, I suspect, who find themselves living in a dangerous and chaotic world, and with their own lives fearfully before them, feel a special affection for these old fellows who have indestructibily battled through - and even a small sense of reassurance ...
I invite you to visit Duane Ensing’s website at:
It still tasted awesome, despite the lack of cheesy pocket. My guess is this has something to do with the flavor injector's flimsy plastic needle. The injector The Shannons linked looks like a fancy one with a metal needle. I may try it again sometime anyway.
"I really like rye beer, so I pushed that up a little more," he says.
Last week he took his two-man crew downstairs and they tore out the knotty pine paneling on the outside backyard wall, took up all the 1970's basement shag carpeting, tore down the ceiling tiles (which had been falling down on a regular basis anyway) and moved in a dumpster to get rid of the debris.
Almost the exact middle, actually. Young and school-trained London singer Woon's debut album, Mirrorwriting, sits between Katy B and James B, pop theatricality and singer-songwriter calm, club culture and bedroom indie, old-school soul and modern electronic R&B, extroverted and introverted. And tying it all together is the language of UK bass. His first major single, 2010's justly lauded "Night Air", announced him as one of a number of young English artists for whom garage, and everything that came after, was just another bit of pop language to use. And from the slow-motion jungle syncopations and muted bass blare of "Street" to the stuttering retro-rave breakbeats that drive "Spirits", the computer-assisted Woon makes sorta-pop from the last 20 years of UK dance the way current U.S. guitar kids draw from surf-rock and girl-groups.
For the good of the state, the people of Sarawak and the Barisan Nasional performance in the coming GE, it is pertinent that the leaders in PBB who are not aligned with Taib and those of the other BN component parties discuss an alternative state leader vis-a vis Taib.
Let us start making changes – first step – being AWESOME today! All you have to do is embrace this feeling – imagine yourself being AWESOME – do it right now and right away! Imagine how you act when you’re awesome, how you speak, how you walk and work! Just be awesome in all fields of your life!
Fuck cellphones. How the fuck do we think we’re ever going to stay on this planet if we keep pumping so much shit into cellphones. You know what they’re doing, right? They’re making it so our entire life can be carried on one tiny fucking handheld thing. Imagine that. A monopoly on life itself. I’m waiting for the day when cellphones actually spew out Starbucks coffee. It’ll happen. It’ll fuckin’ HAPPEN. You’d figure with all these amazing additions to portable communication, they’d actually make a phone that could fuckin’ work as a PHONE!
1. Describe the events in the parable.
Sprinkle some flour on your worktop and roll out the dough, this should be no thicker than 2mm.
ISBN: 978-1-4657-2588-2
You are transformed into a world where rolling hills, sprawling vineyards, beautiful houses, and quaint villages take over. From lunch with a traditional Italian family to cooking pasta, visiting shops selling ham, cured meats and cheese, tasting wines and visiting a local factory making pasta, Antonio and Gennaro keeps you entertained with their wit and humour in Bologna- their first stop. Next they move on to the South of Italy to the Amalfi coast, where Gennaro grew up. Personally this was the most favourite episode for me. Cooking by the sea side, plucking fresh lemons off the trees and biting into them, preparing a linguine dish on a boat using fresh octopus and mussels which Gennaro collected after his diving expedition and the wit and humour the two Italians share among themselves were absolutely fun to watch. Ah! the ricotta and lemon tart they made in this episode still holds fresh in my memory. Its high up there on my to-make list.
* 2 scallions, white parts only, minced
Fried Dry Sambal (Sambal Goreng)
"On sunday I went to Raglan. I went in a car. I got some lollies. they were different colours. They were soft. They were yummy."
Have you always wanted to be a writer?
A pretty shamrock! At this point you just tie it off and you are done. You could attach this to a hairpin or headband if you want. I decided to make it into a ring.
Oct-20 Newark, NJ Prudential Center On Sale Fri. Apr. 27
Then we go away and find/invent the technology that helps us solve that problem. Tech that just looks TEH AWESOMES! but doesn’t actually solve a problem is cute, but is unlikely to get extensively used or widely adopted.
Beeston & Holbeck
But ending her relationship with the bikini company did not make Farrow any less dangerous. Her near-nakedness remained on display in places like Penthouse Magazine, FHM Magazine, and numerous other places who trade on the twisted ways of immodest women and play with the safety of the world on a regular basis. And as the years went by, Farrow started adding more tattoos to her body, making her not only an immodest women, but an immodest women who violated divine commandments by marking her body! There can be little question that she can be held responsible for the 2008 Sichuan earthquake that killed over 68,000 people in China.
While I’m on the subject of university, I think it’s high time the faculty office learned that my name IS NOT ‘Janine’….Learn to read you silly people! Seriously it makes my skin crawl and all I can think about is that God awful character in ‘East-enders’ *Pass the bucket*
September 15th.
Looking through my hubbys phone this morning I found lots and lots of photos from my labor and delivery, so I leave you with these two
Liverworts, like mosses contain no vascular systems to transport water and nutrients throughout the plant. This means they are most likely to be found in damp shady locations. Not surprisingly, wherever you find liverworts, there is bound to be mosses as well. Although liverwort like shade, they also require enough sunlight to conduct photosynthesis.
4) Black Bone Child - Take You Blind
* Lengthened her arms to 24 rows; used a bobble for her thumbs.
Played air guitar on stage with Jethro Tull.
content adapted from the1940census.com
You're a Rock Star note from teacher
2C Fresh Parmesan
Or to take arms against a sea of troubles,
So fiery that after having a mini pushing duel with the Drog Man in the Blue Bridge, he jumped for the ball with his knee up so that he could intentionally catch Drogba on his back.
Before examining Umno, let's take a look at the other side of the fence.
I am pretty sure that beautiful coffee/tea pot in the background came from
Dust Tactics Unleashed
I probably need to get this out-
She continued after a small bout of silence as if he did. “It’s just… you said you shouldn’t worry about the future, but you said if someone warned you of something, you shouldn’t ignore it.”
I’m sure that many times, if not most of the time, she was at least partially asleep for many of the thrashing episodes, but just not resting. She has had several nights of strange waking that’s not really waking. She sometimes sits up, even says something, then collapses again with a snore. A couple times I put her on the changing table to do some saline drops in the nose, she would count the drops like she always does (“1, 2, 3, 4 drops” “other side”), but then she would instantly be quiet, and her breathing maintained the deep rhythm, even though it was labored. Then in 5 seconds, startling again. So weird.
“Uh, you know Ryan, I don’t think I’ll be joining you guys tonight.” Ian responded “I got a lot to take care of… you know. Work”
They had actually already been out looking for seals in the neighborhood, having already retrieved one from the area.
The weekend is starting and I am watching Les closely about the weather for Saturday morning,as far as I know I will be there at the market,hope to see some of you there.
“My most basic credo is: I never said freedom was cheap. And it ain’t. Never will be.It’s been the highest priced and most precious commodity in my life.”
You want Cookie to love and forgive. Okay. She has. That's her nature... her character... her faith. She also knows the difference between a wicked action and a loving action and that those girls and mothers have freely chosen the former. It is not her fault. It is out of her hands. She makes a note of how not to treat others. Prays for them. And moves on.
Quest Level: 10+
In many ways it is a typical love story, yet the pain Logan goes through as a result of his service to the USA gives it such a current and poignant flavor. I appreciated the fact that this heroic character was written with flaws as well.
”You do realise, you can´t own it, the Stonehenge, I mean,” said the Dealer.
Jay: Dude I can't even do that, I can only do acute angles.
When I arrived in Cookeville, TN, an 18-year-old college freshman with no friends in a town far from home, I didn’t know a whole lot. I was not a student of God’s Word, and rarely contemplated matters of faith. I had no more than a vague idea about what I would do with my life. All I knew was that I loved music, and church seemed like a good place to meet friends.
#81. blogger meet-ups
some other books moved off of a dresser in the bedroom to this shelf too, opening up space for some items that had been just floating.
Bull & Bush Pub & Brewery Man Beer
Johnny Ryan: At what point in the future do you see the low micron, multi material, printing lowering to a consumer price point?
20And when thy son asketh thee in time to come, saying, What mean the testimonies, and the statutes, and the judgments, which the LORD our God hath commanded you?
3 tbsp brown sugar
Sausage and Bean Dip
And then left a little more to the left to our wall of windows: master bedroom, family room, and sun room, the last of which houses our casual dining table and JP's new home office. He may be tired of talking on the phone 10 hours a day, but there's no doubt his view is much improved from his old windowless cubicle.
And the willingness to get it done.
I can tell you how NOT to go about things. One, clean yourself and your truck up. If I were to have land and Homeboy showed up in his 4X4 with dog boxes and a bumper sticker that read “Hog Hunters Do It In The Brush” I’ll probably call the cops. Think about that, seriously. The South is known for its rednecks, but that sorta thing won’t garner positive attention.
Rin Tin Tin
I know I'm just a crass American with no business chiming in on finer points of eti-quette and pro-to-col ... but I do know about a bit about trying mothers-in-law. So, I've taken the liberty of channeling my inner Dear Abby and drafting a little missive of my own:
Here is the photo in question…
At around dusk, Emi asked if I wanted to go for a walk in the woods, and of course I said yes. We picked up a friend of hers on the way. It rained this afternoon, and everything had that fresh, sweet smell that you always get after rain in the spring time. The Peepers were deafening as we picked our way through the slick mud, over wet rocks, and through damp grasses, fending off mosquitoes as we went. Emi tried to catch a frog (it was brown, though we're not sure what type it was.) as we wound our way through the flooded areas, looking for peepers and other frogs. We saw the colour of the sky through the trees as the sun set.
Let me pause for a moment. I'm sure that many of you feel that an evening out can be a very much needed thing. I am even sure that it can be well deserved too. But what I haven't told you yet is that that was the first time in four days I had seen Jack.
2008- Vince Young: Young injured his quad and missed only one game. Yet, since his cover, Young has been a shell of his former self. At one point he was on suicide watch, he’s been at odds with coaches and teammates, he has been released and now he’s just a clip board holder with the Eagles. But hey, he came up with the Eagles “Dream Team” nickname last season. Remind me again how that dream turned out.
I'm waiting to hear what is going to happen. Am I going to pop the baby out and have to start "actively" interviewing for positions? Or, am I going to be okay and get to stay put? I really have no idea, my principal really has no idea.
It has also been suggested that local communities should be given the right to buy up closed pubs and run them themselves. This may work in close-knit villages in the Lake District, but it’s unlikely to be of much interest to the neighbours of large urban pubs like the Four Heatons or the Southern Hotel. The most likely result if some kind of “cooling off period” is introduced for people to try to raise the money to buy them is pubs remaining closed and blighted for months with no realistic prospect of ever coming back to life. In general, local communities are more likely to want developers to get on with it and build a block of flats or a supermarket as soon as possible.
After night of sky tears
ABC: You could easily share some of this information with advertisers directly. What value does the CMR offer?
04 Stagnation (Nightride, 22 February 1970)
Pappy rested his back against a tree as Manny and his communications specialist removed their gear from the boat. Manny leaned his pack against a tree near Pappy as a formation of five fighter jets swooshed by low over the treetops.
Movement: Lots of hiccups, lots of forceful movement. He’s been punching some very unfortunate spots lately. Not fun.
CIOs need to think how they can do their jobs differently to provide competitive advantage for their companies. As IT becomes standardised across many industries, it will become harder to differentiate the IT offering. Look harder, competitive advantage is still achievable through innovative uses of IT. The question is whether you as the leader can locate and exploit it?
This is an example of churnalism at its laziest worst. Or is it something more sinister? The statement from the court suggested that "Such inventions are a kind of blood libel, and we wonder why the inventor of the story did not continue to describe how we collected the blood of the dog to make our matzah." That might be going too far. But it says a lot about BBC journalism that they imagined that stoning reincarnated dog lawyers to death was the sort of thing Orthodox Jews get up to.
don't you think?
Chill Out. I have never created a clear layout so when I saw the Hambly Screen Prints transparency included in the kit, I decided to use it as the base of my page. I really like the result. If you decide to try this, I recommend adding a piece of pattern paper to provide some stability to your layout.
Covey amplifies his message by means of wide-ranging examples of “third alternative thinkers”. There’s the local police force that transformed a crime-plagued community by casting off its entrenched “them against us” mentality. Another example tells the tale of a father who, during the course of one extraordinary evening, rescued his daughter from years of clinical depression. Then there’s the judge who brought a swift and peaceful end to a massive environmental lawsuit without setting foot in a courtroom.
Breathe in, knowing we are made of
Parents should also keep the Children with the same Family GP and notify each other of any concerns that may occur during their respective contact times.
Honeybees, like ants and termites, are considered super-organisms. This means that although the colony is made up of many individuals, none of the individuals can survive without the comradery of one another. The queen, workers and drones each have their job, and each job is essential for the survival of the colony. The swarm of bees occurs for many reasons, not enough space is the most common reason, and when it does happen, it is the equivalent of a colony of bees giving birth to another colony. Leaving the hive in this swarm is the mother of the bees from the initial hive, some her loyal workers, and some drones in a massive, incredible, engagingly powerful performance. They leave the ‘parent hive’ looking for new nesting grounds, and in the parent hive they just left, grows a new queen, hatching out young sister bees eager to usher her in to the culture of the hive and ensure her safety in her mating flight and new role as new mother of the colony. All of this is done through the true interdependence, constant plebiscites, and instantaneous communication of the colony…. lol…. much like our society works right? Well, in a community with the Hive Mentality it does!
"I think we (at the Daily Sun) still have the trust of our readers," he says. "We've got our critics but, in most cases, they are not in our target market. We have a target market that is happy with us and they know that whenever they call us, we give them our undivided attention."
So, whatever you do, Don't Get a Dog.
50g breadcrumbs
Making dumplings is a great way to get over that after-work slump of forgoing the dinner plans and diving into a bag of microwave popcorn (I fully admit to having done this), because even though it takes awhile, it's pretty easy, and I felt like a kid in science class watching an experiment! These two dough logs blow up and get all slimy in a big pot of boiling water. Don't worry, the slime subsides by the time they're ready to eat :)
Ogres are considered the weakest stunty team, even though they can have 6 Ogres (and other Ogre Stars that are usually too pricey to squeeze in) because their stunties are only strength 1.
Scale is telling me I'm around 120-122 pounds. So if I go by the heaviest then I have about 3 pounds until I would be back to my pre-pregnancy weight.
For the sake of simplicity I’ve been writing this story with the subconscious goal of keeping each section of each chapter in a particular characters head. According to my little yellow Post-It notes in Writer I start slipping from that practice here. I slip into floating point of view briefly at the end of this chapter when I venture inside Roland’s head for a paragraph. The note tells me I should rewrite, but I’ve read this section over and over and I don’t see the slip of POV as distracting. At this point I am desensitized to any writerly wrong doing I may have performed here. I think the chapter flows properly and the brief switch in POV is harmless. However, I’m not an editor and I’m not reading the story for the first time either. What do you guys think? And do you think that because I called your attention to it?
You do not have took look to Australia to find flirting with animal sex. This is the latest story out of Phoenix Arizona, US.
touched - they must be felt with the heart ~ Helen Keller
6. Sword= a large knife, used for killing animals and cutting up flesh, a small sword, as distinguished from a large sword.
The warden unlocked the leg and wrist shackle device that was all interconnected. “Just tap on the window glass when you are done.”
For me - a lot closer to home - the news of SUSPIRIA on the big screen is just as enticing as the above news. 26th Feb sees Argento's classic playing at Derby's excellent Quad Cinema just 13 miles from where we live. This screening will be introduced by my good friend Darrell Buxton. Unfortunately, an 11.00pm start time and the prospect of a costly cab ride back means we won't have the money to attend, but will be there in spirit.
Kegged: 08-15-2007
Now, I don't want to sound like I'm crapping on the whole movie, because I actually did enjoy it. I think they did some perfect casting with Liam Neeson as Zeus and Ralph Fiennes as Hades. They are two of my favorite actors, and I can't think of any two people more perfect for those two roles. I also have a huge crush on the ruggedly handsome Sam Worthington, and Mads Mikkelson is pretty much great in everything he does, and this is no exception. My favorite part of the movie was the whole Medusa scene. From Io explaining the Medusa backstory to Perseus cutting off her head, it is amazing! Its nuts because they all survive these giant ass scorpions, and the three witches (also a cool scene.."a sacrifice!"), but they all drop like flies when it comes to Medusa. She doesn't even have to do anything. She looks at you...you die. End of story.
I spent most of April focused on drinking more water, and being crazy about fresh lemons!
Juba up ‘n’ Juba down, Juba all aroun’ the town.
3-6-2011
The only sad point to this is when logic kicks in and tells me that at some point this beach will become normal. I can understand the eastern philosophy which says that some things are only meant to be viewed for a moment so that the effect of it lasts a lifetime.
The aroma was filled with the recognizable smell of Smith and Cross: strong, funky and full of promise. Of course the molasses was there as well, though I am still not sure if I was smelling the actual molasses or the Smith and Cross. Also, the pineapple spear, which was an utter garnish failure, awkward protuberance that it was, added a bit of undefinable fruitiness to the nose. The first sip was very molasses-y, though the hogo of the rum carried through at the end. You would think that there would be some sweetness in this drink, but it was dry and earthy, with a vague powdery texture that made each sip seem almost chewy. After I increased the bitters, the spices became more detectable on the swallow. The flavors of the molasses were also enhanced by the increase in bitters--the drink seemed sweeter, in that pleasing molasses cookie way, and the flavors in general seemed more balanced. Overall, not bad but not great.
The essences of indigenous beauty and femininity
Basta. This divorcée has to bring back her mojo. Stare at the blossom buds on the cherry trees, live the season, be grateful, re-learn simplicity.
My mom believes in us, in me, in our abilities to do anything we put our minds to! Never doubting, that we can and will do it. There are so many more things about my mom that I love, but this, this is what I love most about her, she believes in us!
Digitopia, John Akomfrah, UK. Experimental, 33 min.
Joconde Sponge (makes two 1/2 size sheet pans or a 13''x18'' (33x46 cm) jelly roll pan; I made 2/3 of it)
A. I wrote my first picture books when I was three years old. Actually I drew the pictures and my mom helped me write the story. Then I wrote my first novel when I was in ninth grade. It took me all year, and it was pretty terrible. But when I finished, I wrote another book and another and another. During my senior year, after I'd finished a fantasy novel, I went to a writing conference and pitched an agent. But I was too sensitive and I didn't really know anything about the industry, and it didn't go well. I left the conference thinking that publishing wasn't for me. I knew I would always write, but I figured I wouldn't really pursue being published. I wrote consistently after that but never really showed my writing to anyone. Then a year and a half ago I started writing Unraveling and joined a writing group for fun. They really loved it and encouraged me to let an agent take a look.
22.Describe their journey to Scotland. What does Robard discover after his tutoring? How do the locals treat them?
Funny I didn’t need that book cause I was entertained the whole time I was in the air. You know you don’t want to stare at the other passengers but you do. And you try and not think ‘please don’t sit by me” but you do. I scored with no babies next to me screaming (although there was an adorable screamer in front of me) . And the nice Scottish man in front of that baby…was so not impressed. The little one thought his head was a play toy. While he kept saying ‘ma’am, ma’am’ to get Moms attention…Mom and Dad kept slamming back beers and Vodka. We were on our way to Vegas!
This sculpture will be in the gallery until November 9, 2009.
Roger Webster, who gives a rather simplistic view of the historical facts in his bedside book – “The Illustrated at the Fireside - Pg 56”, gives some insight into how it came about that the British press of that time managed to frame Hermanus Potgieter as a rogue and a villain. At that time the Volksraad of the Transvaal had passed a law prohibiting barter with the local people, under a penalty of £37.10. The object of the law ---- now listen carefully, ---- was to keep the peace! The fact that someone was going to make lots of money was beside the point!
Few examples of Major Manglik Dosh are:
A mind at peace with all below,
E@L mimics a coolie accent:"Follow my little flag, we come from Beijing, you follow me, we go to darkest den of the natives. Watch the strange epxats in native habitat. See how they live. This is the foreigner in a zoo. Watch them eat and drink and abuse each other.."
Inspired by the TED talk that Graham Hill gave about becoming a weekday vegetarian, I too am going to aspire for that. I want to make sure that i am able to uphold my agreement so my aim to eat vegetarian for 4 out of the 7 days of the week. So I will have the weekends to enjoy meat, and one day of the week if i am especially feeling like i need to have a nice burger or something. This effects so many parts of the global environment that it is something that a lot of people need to consider. It will help with energy use, preserving land, animal rights, cut back on unhealthy foods and water pollution.
TSUNAMI WARNING IT ISSUED FOR ANOTHER PART OF THE PACIFIC. BASED
Stephen J. Fiorelli, 43, Aberdeen, N.J.
1 Tablespoon Chopped Fresh Parsley- I omitted...not on purpose. I forgot.
Needless to say, we didn’t run classes that week, but it was interesting to see the areas where we would usually hold yoga classes being used instead for BBQs, and the relaxing quiet poolside area being turned into the local evening rum club! Still, the energy was upbeat and positive and all added to the fantastic vibes already there.
In five stories, Christie allows the murderer to escape justice (and in the case of the last three, implicitly almost approves of their crimes); these are The Witness for the Prosecution, The Man in the Brown Suit, Murder on the Orient Express, Curtain and The Unexpected Guest. (When Christie adapted Witness into a stage play, she lengthened the ending so that the murderer was also killed.) There are also numerous instances where the killer is not brought to justice in the legal sense but instead dies (death usually being presented as a more ‘sympathetic’ outcome), for example Peril at End House, Death on the Nile, The Murder of Roger Ackroyd, Crooked House, Appointment with Death, The Hollow, and Secret Adversary. In some cases this is with the collusion of the detective involved. Five Little Pigs, and arguably Ordeal by Innocence, end with the question of whether formal justice will be done unresolved.
Pevan's lip curled as she realised the other woman had jumped expecting Pevan to close the Gate beneath her, not bothering to choose an arc that would bring her to safe ground of her own accord. They certainly would need to have a chat about discipline. Still, there was no time for the horseplay of letting the Four Knot fall back through again. She snapped the Gate shut, and even then Notia stumbled on landing.
It’s also not clear how much we should cheer the 64.6 percent increase in the number of Black-owned non-employer firms. Average revenues at these firms dropped 10.7 percent in real terms between 2002 and 2007. Perhaps more importantly, in 2007 the average revenue at a Black-owned non-employer firm was only $18,500 (in 2002 dollars).
Pat’s standout track – November Rain
Once again mind sits in fear that it might just lose itself.
Posts for the next couple of days may be few and far between. There’s just a little event happening, no biggie.
Despite the horrid waste of taxpayer’s money on the various green energy firms that keep failing, Obama blamed the Solyndra debacle on the Chinese who “were subsidizing their solar industry and flooding the market in ways that Solyndra couldn’t compete.” That was well known before the Solyndra half billion dollar loan guarantee was made, followed by still more to other solar companies.
"The best you can be is a good human being"
My absolute worst fear in this entire world.
What advice would you give to aspiring artists today?
Then as the conversation wasn’t really going to settle anywhere and it was already getting late, I just moved them on to starting to prep the weeks passage. Esther said, we need to talk. So they went into doing personal time with the text and we talked in someone’s room. She was visibly distraught and shared her heart that she was upset in the unbelief that had been coming out in our discussion of what to do about large group. At first I was a little taken aback but as she shared her heart and I reflected back on the conversation, I could see that she was right. We had but Jesus back into a box declaring for him what he could/couldnt do in and through our new people hours after having taken him our of the box at fall con. I felt convicted of my own desire to appease people and unbelief of how Jesus could work at UCI. So we came back together with our leaders and Esther shared her heart, her Holy discontent at what had just transpired and it led to a time of repentance from all of our leaders. That would have been cool enough but in the midst of that time, Jesus ministered to the leader I had prayed with at Fall Con by calling out some of the lies he believed about himself being the weak link in the group as we all affirmed him. It was a beautiful moment of the Holy Spirit doing what was on its agenda, not ours. Please pray that we continue to be open to the interruption of the Spirit.
Crescerà sì tua vaghezza,
Why then Ile fit you. Hieronymo’s mad againe.
1 boarded
Steve Rogers : Wear your suit ( asking him to get ready to fight)
In the foyer up four steps a semi-circle desk presided
You guys ever hear of the Binger, Bing Crosby? He's like Dean Martin, except not drunk all the time and--as far as I know--doesn't try to drug some young woman into a "white Christmas" and his "holiday inn", if you know what I'm saying. If you don't, well, you need to catch up on your classic Christmas movies. Commie. Also, what the hell? Barenaked Ladies made one helluva Christmas album a few years ago, with new songs and traditional. And it's awesome. Try throwing that in every once in a while instead of another rendition of Frosty the Snowman.
Twitter Followers: 300
This film is crazy but there is streak of dark humour running through it all. Rupert Everett narrates Francesco’s thoughts throughout the film, including his meditations on the meaning of life death and love. Francesco is never a nice person but I don’t get this modern obsession with creating likeable protagonists. I love this film and I know other people may not. If you like Italian horror or zombie films you may enjoy this too
A girl should learn to put her gown on properly. No creature living takes more heed of externals than your orthodox man. He may not know the price, color, or material of your clothes, but he will know to a nicety whether you are well or badly gowned.
Floor Stripping
The TON of snow we've accumulated in these parts since November is in meltdown mode right now, signaling the Christmas meltdown.
Have you noticed a difference in people’s attitudes toward religious and spiritual expression between rural and urban communities?
I want to hug my daddy. I am still his baby.
After passing a few awful sicknesses back and forth we are ready for spring more than ever! Today was chilly but the sun was shining and the birds were chirping...so it's coming. This past weekend I put the remainder of the "winter" decorations away and made room for a couple new springy plants.
Wei laughed maniacally as the helicopter went up in a ball of flame.
Maggie (Blog Contributor for Bella Bella Boutique)
SHU REALISES HE HAS FEELINGS FOR INORI
Sigler said it really makes it that much more fun when the fans are involved, and it brings the schools together.
I used for each one, 2 book pages folded accordian style and then almost in half. The shorter end creates the wings.
And by the laughter, I surmise that she could tell without me letting her in on the secret. Apparently, besides my accent deepening into obscurity, I raised my voice several decibels and reverted to my Ghanenglish grammar peppered with Dagbani, something that is significantly different from the speech my Canadian-raised family is used to. And now I’m laughing and blushing, and internally cringing because I feel proud to retain vestiges of my Ghanaian communication skills, but wondering how to balance this maintenance of my slightly shifted identity while re-learning how to connect with Canadians. Especially because I need to sound polished and professional at my upcoming interviews for medicine.
What is one book everyone should read?
I may not have a little black dress, my perfume collection is but one lonely little flask, I may only dream of ever wearing the classic Chanel suit. But I AM French, and as Mademoiselle Chanel said: “There is no time for cut-and-dried monotony. There is time for work. And time for love. That leaves no other time.”
An amazing and amazingly easy baked brie (and when I say amazing, I mean amazing): This was made by another hostess who was kind enough to share the recipe. She found the recipe on the Food Network Website and I sure am glad she did!
Drifting refers to a driving technique and to a motorsport where the driver intentionally over steers, causing loss of traction in the rear wheels through turns, while maintaining vehicle control and a high exit speed. A car is drifting when the rear slip angle is greater than the front slip angle prior to the corner apex, and the front wheels are pointing in the opposite direction to the turn (e.g. car is turning left, wheels are pointed right or vice versa), and the driver is controlling these factors. As a motor sport, professional drifting competitions are held worldwide. Drift challenges drivers to navigate a course in a sustained sideslip by exploiting coupled nonlinearities in the tire force response.
Where do you write? And what does your writing space give you – i.e. why do you write there?
"Yeah, Pete, grab that squirt gun of yours that looks like a German Luger"
I love my expedit units and they hold a lot but I need a lot more than that! If you look at the pictures, I have stuff on the floor, on the counters and my desk, I can barely walk around! There is some unused space in the closet I just need to figure out how to use it...shelves, bookshelf,a special built... I am not sure yet...a little help??
* If you are interested in funding this start-up team, please contact Don Pentecost visionn2action@yahoo.com . You must have “Interested in Sponsorship” in the subject title, or your email will be deleted without being read. This is U.S. based in the Scottsdale, Arizona area.
First of all, for those who don't know I have 3 adopted siblings. They are all from the Philippines. Actually there are six kids in my family and our order goes a bit like this - biological, adopted, biological, adopted, biological, adopted. :) My parents were also foster parents for about 8 years, so we had infants in and out of our house - most in which (I think) were adopted. So as you can tell adoption has been a pretty big part of my life. I always knew I wanted to adopt. It just seemed like something I was suppose to do when having a family. My husband's family is a bit different from mine - he's the only one! Although we came from different types of families, we both knew we wanted to have a family eventually.
Once you have your paper cut out in the size you want, I generally use my Xacto knife to score my folds (very gently, I really don't even push, just drag the blade gently across the paper). I score the "pretty side" of my paper, not the back. A ruler helps to keep your lines straight, if you don't trust yourself scoring the paper, you can also line up your ruler and fold against it to keep your folds crisp.
For those tasks that could very well carry you through the night, you need to realise that somethings are better left for the next day if they are beyond reasonable to accomplish today. You will normally find that doing so will produce a better result anyway as you will be better focused and will have had time to re-energise.
This stunning video tells the story of the bible in 50 words, on a backdrop of superb visuals.
Please download the flyer below for more information
This week has been full of surprises.
Fish fillets – ½ kg, hamour, king fish, or any other firm fish; cut into ½ inch wide x 2-1/2 inches long; dry the fillets with paper towels Soya sauce – 1 teaspoon
See you back soon for the next challenge!
Save the messages and pictures as evidence.
Jolly Holiday's- Tree 1
Midget girls softball tryouts Tuesday and Thursday this week at Somerset school from 3:15 – 4:15.
I stumbled upon this gorgeous muffin recipe while surfing foodgawker the other day. The photo lured me in and once I saw the ingredients list I was hooked.
She saw the helmet and the plume,
The point of cleavage between those who hold the crude theory of Baptismal regeneration, ex opere operato, and those who maintain what is usually spoken of as the "Hypothetical Theory," lies just here. The former believe that the recital of a formula and the performance of a particular action necessarily produce the spiritual effect of regeneration; the latter hold that where believing prayer is offered for a blessing, which we have reason to believe it is God’s will to grant, that prayer will be provisionally answered. The former believe that this spiritual result is absolute, and admits of being neither reversed nor supplemented; the latter maintain that the result, whatever it is, must needs be provisional in its character, and cannot be made absolute until the condition upon which in the case of an adult it is contingent is complied with. The former maintain that the saving effect of this ordinance may be lost by wilful sin; the latter maintain that such saving effects only remain if the condition on which they are contingent is complied with, and, even where wilful sin does not occur, are forfeited by the non-fulfilment of the appointed condition. According to the former theory, no baptized member of our congregations needs to be born again, or, indeed, can be, although his life may be a discredit to our common humanity, and it would seem that the only hope for him lay in the possibility of so radical a change ; according to the other, all who have never consciously exercised faith in the special promise of God made in Baptism need to be told, "Ye must be born again." The difference between the two positions, which may seem to be slight, is really radical. The Gorham judgment given on appeal by the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council affirmed that the hypothetical explanation of the formularies of the Church of England was a perfectly reasonable and legitimate one, though it did not affirm that it was the only possible interpretation. See GORHAM CASE.
I'm a little late (as usual) on this one. Hopworks is releasing their Rise Up Red today. This is a nicely balance Northwest red ale for spring time. I'm going to head down there today to Hopworks for the
My problem at this moment is an ingrowing toenail !!! believe me it is no joke — they are very painful !!!
What we express goes on,lives on, moves on but more importantly stays on
Thanks to Andrew Biddle (andrewbid@gmail.com) for his assistance as Copy Editor
Now I would like to share 3 of the basic dal recipe made in my kitchen quit often (ie) atlest any of these two dals will be made once in a week.
A journal is also something that you can use to comfort your feelings when you are ashamed to do so any other way. You may want to make sure that you are including everything that has happened since your divorce started. You can make sure that you are keeping track of the daily things that make you sad or things that you do to make yourself feel better. As you are writing you will see that your true emotions are coming out and that you are finally able to make some head way on rebuilding your life for the better.
For to long to mention there have been a few hair accessories that needed some attention. They have been sitting on the kitchen counter being moved from one spot to the next. I keep finding a reason to put off this task. After moving them for the thousandth time I finally pulled out the glue gun to get it done.
Anyone who has sung in a cathedral choir in Britain or Ireland will know and love Stanford's church music, which set a standard and started a vigorous tradition what extended almost to the present day. But what I am uploading is one of his piano concertos, played with great verve by the young Irish pianist Finghin Collins. It's classic Stanford – you can hear a nod to Rachmaninoff in the first movement, but the bluff, muscular energy is very much Stanford. I played the first piano quartet a while back, and you notice the same thing – you have to dig into the music from bar one (literally for the strings, who have a wonderful flourish to open the work).
I left the cops in 1998 when I could no longer rape my conscience daily to go to work and serve that septic corrupt dispensation.
Check out the QKD Facebook page for all the March releases in the next week. Check out my March 1 post for details of my blog candy challenge. Keep crafting!!
Formats:
- Jeremy Rifkin, Greenhouse Crisis Foundation
I do owe you guys an apologie, for not responding, reacting or following your blogs. It’s not that i don’t want to, but this project is time and energy consuming, so i don’t take the time to either comment or write a simple thank you. So i take the opportunity now to tell you, that it’s highly appreciated that you follow my blog and read about a project like this…and actually liking it :-p
OTHER FOODS
There is still time to join this week's challenge (the link is located in our upper-most right hand sidebar) and please visit us again on this weekend for news from Kraft Outlet!
CHINAMARINGA IV CHIDZIWA V
1/3 cup Butter, melted
This story focuses on John, a man that works for the government. One day he finds himself tied to a chair in an interrogation room. He doesn’t know why he’s there or what they want, but he does know one thing; he’s not talking. As his interrogators try to coax information out of him he fades in and out of consciousness and reminisces on his life. Will he find a way to escape? Does he even want to?
As things stand at the moment, it is the prevailing view within the Church of England that -- to adopt a minimalist position -- God's Word on the subject of marriage is relatively clear. If there is dissent from that view in the congregation, it is therefore surely the task of the teaching office to correct it.
One day he caught me and I tried to listen to his bizarre imaginings. I felt sorry for him. A couple of his teeth were gone. But he was too loud, too edgy, too nonsensical. Never again. He can have my change. But this performance? I don’t have the time.
A tiny voice in my head whispered YES, and it seemed to know what it was talking about.
The application for UTP May 2012 Intake (Undergraduate – Malaysians only) is now OPEN. However, application for UTP May 2012 Intake (Foundation – Malaysians only) will only be opened once the SPM 2011 results are officially announced (i.e 21 March 2012).
Adress: West Ringdijk 39, 2841 LW Moordrecht (Gouda)
U is for urinary; troubles with flow;
Because that's how blogging works: I offer an endless supply of overshared details from my personal life and you voyeuristically consume them. Duh. And let's face it, this ain't Fifty Shades of Grey I'm living out here in the exurbs, either. Sometimes the most exciting thing that happens involves wire, mesh and a recalcitrant dishwasher named Paco.
Chocolate with toffee creme
Ann, or perhaps Jo, said that one impressive thing about the novel was the way that early on we are led to see the Garners as unusually philanthropic slave owners, but later realize that this is just a matter of relativity, and that they have their own cruelties. I said that one of the most horrifying moments for me, though, was not the out-and-out cruelty from which it's easy to distance oneself, but the incident towards the end when Sethe's living daughter Denver goes to the abolitionists' house to ask for work. Here she comes across something which horrifies her: a small statue of a black child with its head pulled back and its lower lip extended to receive coins casually thrown down, ready for paying tradesmen - a figure so like the Little-Black-Sambo collection figures that stood unremarked outside shops and in arcades in my own childhood, that I was pushed up suddenly against my own unconscious collusion in racism.
They don't say: Your main character should do this... or, I would write it like this...
And manage to cut my lip on the floor.
and a couple of other bits.
The screaming went on for almost an hour.
I used to sell property and casualty insurance down in Sarasota Florida. I remember after I got licensed I was supposed to find a target niche for my prospecting efforts and develop a marketing strategy to target businesses within that niche. I picked professional liability after some quick success in that line of business and put together a prospect list of companies who I wanted to approach about writing their insurance. There was one account that I set my eyes on and really wanted to land. It was a large multi location diagnostics facility with large property and casualty exposures that would not only result in a challenge to structure but would land me a huge commission if I could write the account.
I: Inspiring-Well I am actually taking this from my WW buddy who tells me that I have inspired so many to join WW and change their lives but I just feel like I’m sharing my excitement with other!
They must have magical powers. Even when they’re standing relatively still, taking a drink of water, I can’t get them in focus.
I'm planning my sister's bridal shower & a little getaway with my hunny
Microwave on medium-low power for 16-24 minutes or until it turns thick and caramel color, stirring every two minutes.
Time to let go now, because there is nothing to hold on to now
I had never seen so many hippies in one place outside Central Park. We were all over the grounds and buildings, setting up tents and campsites outdoors and inside, utilizing the communal kitchen, and playing together everywhere. Perhaps what amazed me most during that week was how careful we were to keep the place clean, how nothing was trashed or damaged, how all of us were committed to leaving the grounds as we’d found them or even better.
This book really was a pleasure to read, a pick up any time kind of read, in between cooking tea or bathing the kids. In fact it took me less than 24 hours to read this book! I’ve read a lot of stories of abuse over the last few years, to the point that they started to be unshockable. It was nice to have a different take on a child in care. While Cathy as a foster mother is obviously an official role, you wouldn’t get a story like this from other ‘officials’ eg: social workers.
Fortunately, I have finally landed to official W.A.R. site. It answers my questions; it provide details about the revolution that would soon start on May 14, 2012. Please go to official site of Waray Art Revolution (W.A.R.) for details about various events and schedule.
Good morning! what a lovely week we're having, I dont want it to end! I always feel so much more inspired to create when it's lovely outside and I can have the sun streaming into my craft room!
A month ago I had my little girl. I have still not recovered from the trauma that is natural labor. Seriously.
The only catch? On Passover, we’re not allowed to eat bread. This has to do with the part of the Passover story where the Jews wander the desert, and are unable to make leavened bread. By not eating bread for seven days, we pay tribute to what our ancestors had to suffer during their exodus.
Getting ready to go to bed, hours after his bed time!
porque no hice mal.
"Ons is vir jou Suid-Afrika, Nkosi Sikelel 'iAfrika," Lavonne said.
You get no marks on the egg this way and it can dry all over.
Xiu Min shaking his head. “You can playing with my computer, so just stay here.”
Swirling into the house, touching every corner, smelling of sweet
If I could.
-Kairo: A game about exploring massive, strange spaces and solving massive strange puzzles. It’s… I don’t know. If you’re like me you’re at half-mast just from the description. It’s all well and good to shit on Myst and everything, but I just have a real love of exploring strange spaces. STALKER, for instance, was less about shooting shit for me and more about finding weird old soviet structures warped by strange radiation. Same with Fallout. Looking at something in the distance and finding out why it’s there is just super cool. Like archaeology but with the boring edited out.
Not everyone is a fan of Valentine's Day, and although I'm one of those as well, I just want to be clear that unlike my last book, Fractured Facade, this short story is not about me. Well, some "elements" of the tale are based on true life experiences, but not necessarily mine.
2010.09.18 Afghanistan Nazyan 2 1 Two people are killed by a Taliban rocket attack.
I just love it and I think I have found a new passion. Tranferware! I have a few pieces but definitely will keep my eye out for more to go in my collection. One thought is to make this into a lovely sink for a powder room in our new one-day home. Hubby also came home with these:
Happy Organizing! ♥ Jess
After that we opened my bottle of Midnight Sun Arctic Devil. This one was just a straight English Barleywine aged in whiskey barrels for about four months.
Friends, I have Cathy with me today and she is happy to respond to all of your beauty comments and questions, if any. Like all of us, she's a work in progress and open to improvement.
It was a simple chance event on a London underground station that got me thinking about luck, chance and randomness and led many years later to my new novel, Wasted. It wasn't an earth-shattering event but it got me thinking. Obsessively. So, I began a novel for adults - I'd two unpublished ones languishing already - about chance, quantum mechanics, and unpredictability, involving repeated multiple possibilities. The idea was that if there is a god - which I know there isn't - he will either play dice or at least have a lot of fun observing. But halfway through, a completely different idea hit me, this time for teenagers. I abandoned god and quantum
Hamas leader Khaled Mash’al: “The support we got from Sheikh Al-Qaradhawi is different from the support of anybody else, because of his religious status, his status in terms of morale, and his ability to draw the attention of the nation and the world to the issues of the nation, particularly the issue of Palestine. This support was of great value to us, to the Palestinian people, in the first and second Intifadas, and in all matters pertaining to the Palestinian cause. He has publicly declared his support for the resistance factions, unequivocally and without any hesitation or embarrassment, without fawning over anyone. From day one to the present, the sheikh, may Allah reward him, has not hesitate to support the jihad and the resistance, and to support the fighters, and the resistance factions. One of the most notable manifestations of this support was when we relied – after Allah – on his support of martyrdom operations. He never hesitated to issue rulings in support of these operations, and there were times when we were in dire need of these rulings.”
SU! - Because I Care stamp set
Hall then drove down the street, turned around, came back at the victims and ran down the woman, according to the sheriff’s office.
I promise that at 24, you will not regret waiting for “the one.” I promise you even more so, that he was worth waiting for.
curled in their river-gravel mounds
*Our yard is going to pot from lack of rain. Being restricted to sprinkler watering once a week is not enough, not with these relentless high temperatures we are experiencing. I go outside at twilight, when it is still 95 degrees, to water by hand a couple times a week, but it gets dark too fast…Everyone is getting as sick of the weather as they are of complaining about it.
#26 1973 Relay Team EP Bel Air Sprint Medley 3:32.9
Love, Michawn and the whole Ebersole crew...Joel, Grady, Hadley, Eissa, and Cass
On his pillow,
The story revolves around Vyme a mechanic at the star pit where ships are repaired. He tries to help out young people that want to work in the repair shops. One is Ratit. It seems Vyme misses his own group family and his kids. He has a drinking problem and that alienated him from everyone.
Progress…
Restaurant magazine revealed its annual “World’s 50 Best Restaurants” list on Monday at an awards ceremony in London’s Guildhall. This year marked the tenth year for the countdown.
Publishing's Ecosystem on the Brink: The Backstory
Well in true Debbie P form not only was my blog candy "better late than never" but my winner's announcement is too - LOL. Although I DID say I would post it on March 31st and it may be April Fool's Day here in Australia but I have it on good authority it's STILL March in other parts of the world!!!
Bachmann: yes
3. The Food inspection authority FIA (Mattilsynet) is the overseeing authority of this law. They do not have resources to enforce the law.
To maintain: To maintain your starter, try to feed it at least once a week, although it can go for a month or longer. The starter may have a substantial layer of green, grey, or brown liquid on the top and that is okay; it is simply alcohol from the fermenting yeast.
The trail ends at the Atlantic & Yadkin Greenway, not far from Lake Brandt Road. By turning right, you can follow the Greenway back to Bur-Mil Park for a five-mile loop. The Owls Roosts Trail also offers an additional 1.25 miles of trail along a service road and an official shortcut that links the sections along the northern and southern arms of the lake.
J had an egg scramble with bacon, mushroom and sausage which also looked good. It was a lovely cosy atmosphere with little booths and squishy chairs. The meal for both of us, with 3 drinks, was only $30 which was great.
Sharon Potts is the award-winning author of In their Blood and Someone's Watching, suspense novels about ordinary people in extraordinary situations set in South Florida. Her work received the 2010 Benjamin Franklin Award for best mystery/suspense novel, as well as a starred review in Publishers Weekly. A former teacher-turned-CPA-turned-business-exec-turned-writer, Sharon is currently VP of the Florida chapter of Mystery Writers of America.
Schirmbeck on Wednesday filed a formal complaint over the matter with Galveston County District Attorney Jack Roady. He also asked for an investigation into whether the city’s use of public funds on pro-camera advertising on the public access television channel 16 and on the city’s website violates state election law. In November, residents will have a chance to vote on whether to continue the photo ticketing program. Schirmbeck believes the slick video material was produced by Redflex, but the commercials did not disclose their true origin, in violation of state campaign laws.
May 03 1:34 AM
I was so proud of how well they played in their tournament. The next season starts next weekend, so the football fun really never ends around here! :)
I am also into bento making for my girl . This is not an easy task but I try my best to learn from blogs and books. I hope I can sustain this 'bentoing' but for how long I have no idea....cos I have to wake up as early as 5am then rush everything by 630am and to leave home by 645am.....rushing like mad right? But when my girl and boy told me that they love the food I prepared for them...I think its just worth it =)
November 22, 2010 AccuWeather Sea Ice Report – Northern Sea Ice still coming back – Southern Sea Ice on long increasing trend.
Please feel free to add our top 3 badge to your blogs, great creations ladies!
Don't be offended if you post a comment and it doesn't show up for a few
Little Sun Sun Island Collect all 4 oil barrels on Sun Sun Island
My son enjoyed the play and felt the stage adaptation was quiet creative. That said, he told me he might have been a little old for the show. I'd place the target age around 6-10 years old.
(Note: The photos are taken from copies already circulating in other forums and blogs)
At the wheel of Falken Tire’s Porsche 911 GT3 RSR, the winning car at Mid-Ohio and Baltimore, Bryan Sellers (USA) posted the ninth quickest time. He contests the race with Porsche factory pilot Wolf Henzler (Germany). “We didn’t have an optimal set-up today, but we know that our car and the tyres will perform much better in the race than in the qualifying,” explained Bryan Sellers. Wolf Henzler added: “The circuit was very cold over the last days. Today we have sun and the asphalt temperatures were suddenly much higher. That changed everything. Our team still simply lacks the experience of reacting to such changes in a short timeframe.”
This book was emotional, and sometimes hard to read. But it was Lisa's lyrical and poetic style of writing that made me stay reading the story. I really loved Janie's character and I thought that throughout the series, she's really grown to accept who she is and what she can do.
Now for today’s nature spot. We found this small being taking the sun on one of the plants in front of the library.
Anyway its late and I'm off to get sorted for tomorrow
It's unfair to you because you may not be aware of what you are signing up for, in which case, you may host their advertisements for free without making any money. Whether or not it's ethical to post editorial content that you may make money off of is really up for grabs at this point in the blogopshere. I personally feel uncomfortable about placing advertisements in my blog unless they are clearly marked.
When I was in Phnom Penh recently, I discovered in the guidebook that there was a cafe called the “Lazy Gecko Cafe”. I looked it up on the map and saw that it was quite far from where I was staying and also from most of the areas I would be visiting. However, the pull to seek out this lazy gecko was strong and on my final day, I decided to hunt it down and sink a coffee or two.
All edges were coloured with Memento green dye ink applied with cut'n'dry foam. The bottom panels were first trimmed out of Kraft card and then matted with the pink paper.and stuck in place as shown. The main panel on the plaque was put together similarly but before attaching was stamped with a moth stamp (PaperArtsy) in Archival black ink and embellished with a diecut (Nestabilities) tag with pink panel and another 'Smile' stamp (PaperArtsy). The roses were applied at the base on foam pads. A piece of 3 mm dark green satin ribbon was tied through the hole in the tag and a piece of black numbers Washi tape applied before sticking in place.
Highland Council planning officials have recommended that a controversial whisky distillery on the remote Ardnamurchan Peninsula be approved, despite attracting 52 letters of objection.
Tens of thousands of mainly Shiites took to the streets in Bahrain in February and March demanding political reform and better rights, with some calling for the downfall of the Al Khalifa monarchy. The uprising was brutally crushed by the regime and thousands were arrested and sacked from public and private sector jobs.
I wanted to like The Final Countdown a lot more than I did. This is one script, however, that ends up just as a drama, with a couple of intriguing scenes involving aerial recon pictures and historic pictures, and another scene where that captured Japanese pilot suddenly realizes what is going on. It was so close, so often. And the very last scene with the black limo WAS clever, but you expect that at the end of an episode of "Twilight Zone". You expect MORE from all this and World War II.
I can get popcorn from the canteen.
120g plain flour, sifted
it just stands out as a "better than what i feel i am capable of" type of photo. but i have to say... i got lucky. i mean, look at my subject! she is like a goddess. the expression on her face was completely her doing. i in no way directed her to look so expressive and perfectly frozen in time. so peaceful. so beautiful. so, i know i am just lucky. still... i pushed the shutter button at the precise moment to capture this image, so i have to give myself at least a little credit. and thus, i can not help but make this my favorite photo.
Hahaha, in Malaysia, semuanya terbalik (everything’s opposite). That’s Malaysia, truly Asia, for you:
Ratcheting up its campaign to make online TV and connected TV supplier contribute to network bottlenecks, Korea Telecom is reported to be asking firms and firms, in particular Samsung, to share in revenues they gain from such services.
When I stood, he withdrew with a windy swoosh and I stood face to face with a dark, stygian gulf. Black glass rained down inside the opening, and Cloak stepped forward examining the opening with a nervous musing. The closest thing he might have ever come to laughing. The mechanical frenzy deep below the earth erupted with a furious howl.
On completion of the program successfully, all participants will be provided placement that matches their profile and career plan.
My friends, this year, why don't you say "I love you" to your significant other with a black heart sporting a bedazzled Darth Vader?
The Hillsborough County Sheriff’s Office said Deputy Juan Lazu was on patrol in Tampa early Sunday when a large SUV crossed the median and continued in the wrong direction.
The smell of BBQ Spare Ribs and Spicy Buffalo Wings..
But fortunately the Meadowside offices are lovely and bright and there was a real surprise of a welcome when I finally reached the fourth floor ( toilets on the floor below.) "We've got something to show you," said Lucy with a grin and pulled me to a bookshelf display at the back of the room. And there is was! My novel, HIDDEN, in proper novel format! I was so excited.
Sunday it's all about skill builders:
Hmm where do I start from? where? where? where…? Oh yeah, there!. So I’m quite certain that every believer knows what “New Creation” means (at least I hope so). When asked to define the term, words like “born-again”, “salvation”, “repentance”, “baptism” etc are bound to be used in the definition. That’s all good but who really is the “NEW CREATURE”? The creation story helped me understand this better so let’s start from there… Once upon a time, God created man (and woman), gave him authority over everything on earth (Genesis 1:27-31) and placed him in the Garden of Eden where man could be close to HIM (GOD) all the time. One day, the enemy of God (and all God’s children), satan, tricked man into sinning against God. Satan gave man “sin and the pleasures that come with it” and in return man gave up his authority over earth and everything in it, hence, man came under the rulership of satan. Uhmm.. yeah I guess you can call it an exchange… satan brought sin to man and man paid with his authority over the earth. A poor exchange indeed…but hey, it was no robbery. Anyway, satan, having all the authority now, become the ruler of man; and man the slave of satan (Jesus replied, “Very truly I tell you, everyone who sins is a slave to sin” John 8:32). Man was forever doomed as a slave of the enemy and like anyone who is sentenced to life imprisonment without appeal, the only way of escape is DEATH. Scary huh? I know! Well, God who created man and loved man in spite of man’s disobedience wanted to free His creation from bondage so He had to send no one else but LIFE to set man free. The Son of God, JESUS CHRIST is LIFE (Jesus answered, “I am the way and the truth and the LIFE…John 14:6″; “In him was LIFE…John 1:4″). JESUS was/is the only ONE who can set man free…WHY? Think of it this way. Man’s only hope of escaping the slavery of satan is death and we all know everyone dies but once. You have one chance to live and after that, there is death and judgement etc. God couldn’t watch man die in his sins so there had to be another way to set man free and that way is JESUS. Jesus came on the earth as a man, suffered and died…but uh huh, that’s the best part. He died not just for dying sake but He died so He could defeat DEATH. He had to defeat death so He could give man a second chance to life. For 3 days He was dead but on the 3rd day, He rose again having won POWER over death…”..Whosoever believeth in Him should not perish but have EVERLASTING life” John 3:16. Everlasting life is possible in Jesus because He holds both the power of LIFE (because He is LIFE) and DEATH(because He defeated death) in His hands. Any man who then believes in Him is set free from slavery through death but is given another chance to live and is given a NEW LIFE. Jesus creates the old slave who died anew and breathes LIFE again into his nostrils to make him a living soul…(Then the LORD God formed a man from the dust of the ground and breathed into his nostrils the breath of life, and the man became a living being: Genesis 2:7). This is why anyone who is born-again/born in Christ is said to be a NEW CREATURE (Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old things are passed away; behold, all things are become new: 2 Corinthians 5:17). Just like the first man ever created, the NEW CREATURE is not placed back on in the world he just got freed from, he is placed into a world, a place, a kingdom where he can be close to God again. The NEW CREATURE no longer belongs to the world of sin and slavery (…because ye are not of the world, but I have chosen you out of the world, therefore the world hateth you- John 15:19). The blessings and authority (Gen. 1:28-31) man God first gave to man before the fall is returned to the NEW CREATURE who becomes part of the body of Christ (…and set him at his own right hand in the heavenly places, far above all principality, and power, and might, and dominion, and every name that is named, not only in this world, but also in that which is to come: and hath put all things under his feet, and gave him to be the head over all things to the church, which is his body, the fulness of him that filleth all in all- Ephe. 1:20-23). Yup! Not only does the NEW YOU receive freedom and salvation in CHRIST, but you also receive power and authority over satan and his followers. So now you know…The “NEW YOU” who is born in CHRIST is more powerful and more important than can be comprehended. YOU are God’s own precious POSSESSION bought at a very high price. YOU are PRICELESS as could be. Turn to HIS WORD to fully know the “NEW YOU” He created.
Then Tyson turned around and I noticed something.
So that's the excitement for today.
I was in a rush putting this tutorial together so some phrase might not be clear but I was hopping the pictures will help. Your feed back is greatly appreciated.
Clinging to my seat as others,
O LORD, open my eyes so I may see.
Brown silk with little yellow and magenta flowers, above knee length, with a tulip skirt, pockets on the hips and a fitted waist. I think it's Anne Klein though the label is gone, it was an expensive dress for me back then, just beginning college. It was barely warm enough to wear it today, as it is sleeveless, with a yellow shrug sweater over it. (And a coat for going outside!)
"I am tired; there are no reasons for everything in the world!" I answered.
I am so pasty looking that I had to make it black and white.
I end these musings with a parable I wrote several months ago when I saw then the tendency to hide behind our procedures rather than to step boldly into Holy Truth.
So I pondered and scratched out various possibilities, and casually read through various texts by and about Che or Abe, wondering what the most suggestive, poetic and concise way of connecting these two men across time and history could be, until one day I hit on something that I just knew was right. It was a quote, by Che, in reference to his trip to New York City in 1964 to address the United Nations’ General Assembly. It seems that while he was in New York there were two attempts on his life, one by a man wielding a gun and one by a woman with a knife. When asked about these attacks by a journalist, he is said to have responded with a smile and a bemused wisecrack: “It is better to be killed by a woman with a knife than a man with a gun” said Che.
We join together in meditation and prayer this morning seeking to realize that the fabric of our lives is woven by our own hands, every thought, every word, every action is a thread in the social tapestry. So as we weave let us always be mindful that each and every thread is a contribution, our contribution, to the whole. Amen.
Maybe Facebook should hire Thomas Friedman to do its ads. His ad for Coursera (h/t Indyanna's comment at Historiann's) column on online education pretty much explains why the 100,000-person online class and the flipped classroom, with local professors as glorified tutors, is the way to go. The comments are good, and they ask the same questions we've all been asking and come to some similar conclusions.
The motorcycle jump.That one everybody’s seen.
Pop Back tomorrow when its Me (Hazel) with the Challenge for you.
1. You Don’t Know Me
While the first narrative was about people who had a multitude of reasons to not be happy, the second one could’ve almost been a fairytale. Here we meet Antoine (Kevin Parent) a middle-aged DJ who is living an enviable life raising two gorgeous daughters with his equally pretty girlfriend (Evelyne Brochu). But life is not always a bed of roses because he still thinks of his ex-wife (Hélène Florent), his first love and original soul mate.
2. Bring an Abundance of Water and Food on Hikes: The rule of thumb when hiking is: when half of your water supply is gone, start heading back. Last summer I hiked Upper Yosemite Falls, one of the oldest trails in Yosemite, and leads to the highest waterfall in North America at 2,425 ft. It took me 3 hours to hike up and I tried to conserve my water as much as possible but unfortunately I was not able to. Fortunately, when I finally got to the top there was a benevolent man who was filtering water, from the waterfall, to give to weary hikers. Make sure to bring snacks that are high in protein and carbohydrates such as granola bars and nuts because when the hike says strenuous, it means it!
Like, instead of, 'Golly! Someone didn't flush!' now you say,
This morning we did some gymnastics up to 3'3".
Let’s examine the second half of the video. One protester calls out ‘Mic check!,’ and everyone knows what this means. This guy will speak for us, he has something to say. And if they disagree, they can simply stop passing this person’s words along. But in this case he speaks words of de-escalation. We will let you police leave. He’s teaching the police a lesson in non-violence. It’s amazing to see this at work.
So end our readers’ tributes to Hitch. As I expect many of you have been doing, I’ve spent quite a few hours over the last two weeks watching videos of Christopher in debate, giving talks, or taking down pompous talking heads on television. I could recommend my favorites, but suggest instead that you just find a random one and follow the YouTube links. You will be impressed: for someone who talked so often, he rarely repeated himself, and everything he said sounded fresh. We have nobody to replace this man, but, thank Ceiling Cat, he left us a legacy of not only his writings and the example of his courage, but also the visual record of his eloquence and incessant fight for the truth.
Sooooo…To ensure I don’t get a red welt on my other cheek…What are your recommended/required bleed specs for a project such as the one you quoted us? Thanks a million.”
Adobe flash player:
He nods at her proposal and puts his head back into his book.
Dijk Bloedend hart NL
When the captain of your ship tells you to do something in a somewhat frenzied or stern voice, it’s almost always for your own good and everyone else’s, so you should just shut your mouth and do it. And not get defensive about it.
maintenance or replacement, barely
I had to change it to this horrid looking one until I figure out the issues I'm having with Blogger, and aparrently Artisteer might be causing some problems with accessing my page too. Not sure there.
When was the last time you gave your windows any attention? Last week? Last month? Last year? Its spring and a great time to have a "cleaning" challenge. This week I am challenging you to open up the drapes, pull up the blinds, and let the sunshine in! We are going to be washing the windows! Throughout the rest of April, we will be concentrating on spring cleaning during the weekly challenges. Its always more fun cleaning with others.
Micky is wonderful: she wiggles when I come near her and when I stroke her she starts purring like a kitty and rubs her little head on my fingers. Incredible. I know she needs a real partner – but what can I do at the moment?
Coming in the not so distant future!
Topic covered include:
Believe me I had NO problem doing
and the ash. Not so,
Do you have a day to day writing schedule or do you fit in the words wherever you can (like so many of us!)
Mountain views
"Well, maybe I was wrong."
The cream of Rutland society is mingling with the great and good of the Liberal Democrats. On the stairs, the elves of Rockingham Forest are attempting to share a joke with Sarah Teather. Through the French windows I can see Meadowcroft chasing stray guests off his lawn with a broom.
If I didn’t know any better i’d be an alcoholic by now, good thing i’m smarter than that. ”And the worlds got me dizzy again, you’d think after 24 years i’d be used to the spin.” man this line by Conor is so damn true. ”But you may be offended and you may be afraid but don’t walk away, don’t walk away…” ”And our freedoms a joke we’re just taking a piss…”
Well here is the first interview I’ve ever carried out – with Louis Abbott from Admiral Fallow.
Row 13-16- ch1, turn, sc in ea sc. (20)
A few pictures from our day...
And you, my sweet, from head to feet
Last month Sudan arrested a Briton, South African and Norwegian, along with a South Sudanese soldier whom authorities said had illegally entered the Heglig area and accused them of being spies for the SPLA. South Sudan believes Heglig is part of its territory.
Color mixing went very fast for this too. I'm getting more confident with it. My blues are greyed with orange, and my reds with green. I'm finding that my blues go toward orange too much, and I think I'm going to start using black and white to grey my colors a bit more along with compliments. It really depends on the color though. Because every color has a cast to it, and isn't a perfect blue or orange, when you mix them to get grey you can get unpredictable results, and I like that, but I want to get more control over it in a more predictable way, so straight up grey should help.
I’m going to privatize my past posts so this will be the only one on the page. I’m keeping the name – penghost – but not the slogan. Again, though, this is only a hiatus. I’m just taking a break. I’m not giving up on blogging. I just need to find my coherent blogging zen, I guess.
We love pork belly, but here it is more traditionally used as “pancetta”, boiled in stocks and soups to add flavour or cut into tiny chunks and done on the plancha (griddle) or deep fried as a little tapas. Often it will have the skin removed.
Hẹn gặp lại!!
The implication of preparing to move Russian troops not only is to protect its own vital regional interests but possibly to assist Iran in the event of such an attack. Sources add that a Russian military buildup in the region could result in the Russian military potentially engaging Israeli forces, U.S. forces, or both.
A pipe dream, I know, as so many see the wheels as an extension of their existence. Could one really expect all the insecure men fearful about the size of their penises to not hop into these big trucks so they can feel big in the world? It is human men like this who are behind the wars and the need t smash things…
Having such a huge burden gone has effected everything. I am back to making my meals in the morning. My dishes routine is working again. I have had the extra time to put most my cupboards etc in order again. It's like there's a light at the end of the tunnel...with projects I have been craving to do for so long. Stuff I enjoy. The last week or two I have started to feel that old me again. That girl that used to enjoy LOTS of things. Feels so good.
And so I began. I used the instructions I found online as my chief guide but after three days I was a little skeptical that the sour dough had fermented enough or produced enough yeast. My Twitter friend Finn said that he had been feeding his starter ("Veruca") for 12 days and it was now time. So I asked him if he thought my starter was ready? He confirmed what I thought and said no. So I've been letting "Finn Jr". grow and grow. Last night he became a rebellious teenager and we woke up to him trying to escape the safety of his jar to explore the world (thus the picture above this posting).
1 tsp chilli pwd
“The Wallflower” rose to No. 2 on the rhythm-and-blues charts in 1954. As was often the case in those days with records by black performers, a toned-down version was soon recorded by a white singer and found a wider audience: Georgia Gibbs’s version, with the title and lyric changed to “Dance With Me, Henry,” was a No. 1 pop hit in 1955. (Its success was not entirely bad news for Ms. James. She shared the songwriting royalties with Mr. Ballard and the bandleader and talent scout Johnny Otis, who had arranged for her recording session. (Mr. Otis died on Tuesday.)
The key to this entire problem was failure to understand Paul’s ministry and message. Were Lysius to side with the Jews, he would be as lost as they. Fortunately, he had Paul in a semi-private audience. The Jews no longer had a gospel message for God was no longer dealing with them. To Paul was given the gospel of the grace of God for so we read in Ephesians 3:2.
Dad went for a walk around when we got there and mum and i got the boys into their swimmers. Then Jordy was straight in the river and wanting to go floating off downstream. Mum had Darcy and i was still getting ready to get in and Jordy is off! Little bugger. I was a bit worried about him going over the edge of the waterfall but i met him down the end and he kicked over to me. Not that it was a big waterfall! He would not have been hurt if he went over but he might have scared himself.
But then something else happened. That same baby that was gifted to her from heaven, the one she felt growing and moving in her womb, the same child that gave her pleasure every time he said ‘mama’, fell ill and died, in her lap.
I couldn't work out what punch Mercedes used for her hippo legs, so I improvised with the Modern Label punch (very good investment that one!!). I also recently acquired an Ornament punch and can't wait to have a go at the multitude punch-art options that one has opened up for me.
A closer look at the jewellery rack shows the Swarovski rack, pearl rack, gemstone rack, some still to be bagged and sorted stones, Scrabble tiles for pendants, many MANY pairs of pliers and cutters, the world's largest collection of steel wool, hundreds of dollars worth of sterling silver wire, and a train case FULL of unset stones for ring making!
Boris you beauty! Bojo's latest epistle in the DT opens with him at the ArcelorMittal Orbit structure in Stratford; "This sculpture is a masterpiece, far better and more rewarding up close than it appears at a distance". However, he goes on to reveal "everything that is wrong with the BBC and with this country"...and speaking "as one who has just fought a campaign in which I sometimes felt that my chief opponent was the local BBC news"!! Please read what he says about the BBC, Blair and Brown. An opinion which I share of course...
The Eau Gallie Record posted jokes on a regular basis for their readership to enjoy. Here are a few that I will share with you.
Here's the Great Audrey. The pageant tiara or more commonly known Holly Golightly pictured below, is the tiara we associate with brides today. She was somehow regal, whether faking it till she made it in Breakfast at Tiffany's, or the European aristocrat in Roman Holiday. Note how Audrey could wear these three very different tiaras in the roles she played.
Billy Bob: But isn’t Claire your sister??
1 Dec 2011: British American Tobacco initiates proceedings in Australia’s High Court to test the validity of the law as it relates to property rights of two brands, Winfield and Dunhill. Press release
The Princess and the Pea by Hans Christian Anderson
When can someone receive Holy Communion without fasting? (When one is in danger of death.)
Next, write down all the skills you need to learn or to work on. If you are just getting started with writing, you may find this difficult. If people have made comments on your writing, you can use those comments to make your list. If, for instance, you have been told that your characters are not believable or your descriptions fuzzy, then the skills of creating characters and writing description go on your list. Or try this: read over a piece of writing by your favorite author, writing you consider excellent. Now write down all the things the writer does that make this piece so good. How many of these things can you do now? How many of them do you need to learn how to do?
The later Victorian dining tables extended by means of a winding mechanism operated by a handle.
Rating: 4.5/5 A masterfully realized story of social issues and a family; held from perfection by a tired characterization of the mother.
What if they were to do a study to report a finding of clinically obese people who'd take a year or more off their lives for a "perfect" body? Or people with some sort of birth defect? Or - and perhaps most pertinent to my own situation - transsexuals?
I was thinking, researching and analyzing a lot of information in past several months – particularly, how all those things happening in Thailand (political problems, social unrest) and in the world (economic crisis, “pandemic”, rise of transnational corporate fascism), and perhaps fair to say in universe (I wouldn’t got into much details about it here, would only say - all the metaphysical and spiritual sides of our existence and current events) - and how ALL that affects me personally. and mainly – what and how I should do about it.
I can tell you that I don’t hate you, nor does Joan. All that’s wanted by either of us is to have you out of her life. Hate has way of aging a person and eating away at them. It will eventually turn back on the person doing the hating, and affect them as much, or more, that it affects the object of that hate. Are you capable of letting go, or are hateful behavior and bullying the only languages you understand?
I have slowly been making progress on my Modern She Made Swap project. I am going to try and finish the rest of the paper piecing by tomorrow evening. Once I get my partner's feedback, I will either be turning this beauty into a mini quilt or pillow cover. Who knows, I might even add some hand quilting in there as well!
The Valley of Fire certainly sparkled for us. It flickered its red flames and easily entertained us with its powerful array of beauty.
That place is delicious. Just walking through the door puts me in a better mood.
Which never yet a living person left.
You might be in pain and feeling alone - but as always, you hide it with humour and smiles? Which is fuckin’ stupid really, because you're certainly not laughing are you?! You're known for your smile - so use it!
Was this article useful? Have more to add? Please leave a comment.... we really want to hear from you! Yes you!
What ought to be acutely troubling is that the history of revisions to oil and gas resources has heretofore been one of increases. For the first time, we are now seeing not just downward revisions in estimated natural gas resources, but drastic downward revisions. That should tell us that the era of unlimited horizons for fossil fuels has come to a close. All the advanced technology that was supposed to bring unending plenty in the form of fossil fuels is now giving us better estimates of what will be available, namely, not nearly so much as we thought.
turn only to each other
A car passed on the opposite side of the road, slowing down in a blur of red brake-light. A man got out, and stepped into a light jog across the slushtracked streets. "You alright?" He called out to her.
The bad news is that while we were away, and despite mom’s best efforts, the cats (Mr. Sparky Lewis we are looking at you) took the opportunity to munch on my newly sprouted peas and peppers.
burn with familiarity
Where Your glory fills every empty space
I want to start with talking about Sawyer and Kate because I believe that this relationship was arguably the more apparent of the two, definitely the more active and perhaps even the more popular choice for indifferent/casual viewers. Why? Because Sawyer and Kate together was the obvious choice, the easy choice, and the in many ways expected direction for the characters to head in.
Texture is what makes things interesting. A white sheet of office paper is boring because it has no texture. But a sheet of artist's watercolour paper is more interesting, because it's uneven surface reflects the light in a more natural way.
Thus, no doubt soon you will probly hear soon some business leaders or pretend potential self-appointed communist leaders lamenting the lack of organization of the #Occupy movements, describing them as "in choate" (which is a kind of wide penis with no head), or "udderless," or "lacking discernible goals" (like Sporting Gijon). What they are really mean is that there is a ferment of new ideas that therefore could be dangerous and must be curtailed, or at least curtopped. After all, nobody has any idea where a march that goes nowhere might end up. If these peoples weren't too feckless to emigrate we could at least lure them onto a ferry with the promise of jobs in Australia and transport them there. We would never hear of them ever again! But while they are there, in the midst of ordinary, heads-down, knees-back God-fearing punters, fermenting theories without limitations and trying out new processes, such as democracy—never a positive development—they constitute a threat to our docile, passive, obedient way of life. They must be stomped on by square-headed baton-wielding riot police, preferably from up the country, before any new ideas seep out into the public body at large, like a ball of ideological pus.
Friday night we had dinner at Renaldi's on Lincoln, which was perfectly kid friendly and easy! After dinner we went back to Courtney's house for wine and bonding. Courtney has an adorable new apartment in Lincoln Park were the group stayed for the weekend. Sean, Ellie, and John spent some time watching the old Muppet Movie-- getting ready for the new one out this week. We can't wait to see the muppets back on the big screen again!
BONUS! Sarai is offering a 20% discount on the pattern for Sew-Along participants during the month of January. Please use the promo code MPBNEGRONI (It MUST be entered in all caps) to enjoy the discount.
Now that a few days have passed, I look back on that Chrysalis weekend with such joy. I don’t think about the logistics of it all, I think about how present God was throughout it. With God’s help, that weekend was flawless. And as I sat on Sunday listening to these girls talk about how positively affected they were by this weekend.. I knew at that very instant that every bit of sweat and tears was worth it.
Submit a caption for The New Yorker cartoon featured above.
As Rich reminded me, who knows how long this will last. It's not very often that we are home together on a weekday and inevitably, at some point in the future, it will change so we need to take advantage of it while we can.
2-3lbs ribs cut into 2 inch pieces. Garlic ginger and hot pepper, about a tbsn each finely chopped. Toasted sesame seeds (do in a dry pan until they brown) about 2 tbspns. Tbspn dark soy 2 tbspns light. 1/2 cup rice wine. 1 cup water or chicken stock hot.
Nothing can stop you, slowly, just a little bit more
There is a woman who works down the hall from me, who I run into at the coffee machine every morning. This is notable, since we both arrive at the office absurdly early by Biglaw standards. She is making a career transition from graphic designer to non-profit administrator and has been working full time, and going to school part time, for three years now. No one promised this process would be fast. No one promised that it would be easy. Luckily, there is so much to learn along the way. That will have to be my focus. Each day I am faced with this new challenge and as I learn more about myself and the society that I inhabit, I get closer to where I want to be. That will have to be enough for now.
Meet Samantha. But we hardly ever call her that. Mostly, we call her Little D. That’s D, for Diva. Because it’s all about her. After a long weekend visiting family in Pennsylvania, we came home and adopted her at the humane society. There, she was named Thelma. You can plainly see that name just didn’t suit her. (Actually, I wanted to name her Tootsie and the hubby wanted to name her Tarot. Then I jokingly suggested Samantha because she was being a little naughty at the time – she jumps up on the counter and I put her back down she jumps up on the counter and I put her back down she jumps up on the counter and I put her back down she jumps up on the counter… Anyway, I said to my hubby that we should call her Samantha because “naughty girls need love too”. Ha. What can I say, I was a teenager in the 80s.)
Children’s Miracle Network Hospitals provide treatment and hope to millions of sick kids each year, in 170 hospitals in Canada and in the United States.
I don’t know…maybe nobody else feels like this about indie publishing. But this is sort of where I think I am with it. It’s wonderful on so many levels – but its big flaw, I think, is that it’s just too easy. Too easy to implement…too easy to mess up…too easy to get discouraged (because your frame of reference when you’re solo is really quite small). Too easy, essentially, to jump in when you’re green and flounder around…because you’re green.
forget about him and never see
SkyWest’s total operating revenues increased $55.2 million, or 6.4%, during the quarter ended March 31, 2012, over the same period in 2011. The increase in operating revenues was the result of higher pass-through costs (primarily fuel and engine overhaul costs) under SkyWest’s agreements with its major partners and an increase in block hour production. The increase in operating revenues was offset by a planned reduction in prorate flying block hours of 13.4% resulting in reduced revenues of approximately $6.0 million. In spite of the reducing operating revenues from prorate flying, SkyWest’s revenue per available seat mile for this flying increased 14.6% from improved pricing. After excluding the increased pass-through costs of approximately $31.1 million, for fuel and engine overhauls, and the reduction in prorate flying revenue of $6.0, total operating revenues increased approximately $30.1 million due to the additional block hour production of 3.1% and improved utilization. Total block hours for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 were 556,421 compared to 539,910 for the same period last year.
Quentin Tarantino, Inglourious Basterds
#5: He understands that after a long run and then lunch it's important to stop by Walgreens and buy up the Easter candy remnants. 18 cents for a pack of Peeps? Don't mind if I do.
Frost
Personally, I am a fan of books like this that help bridge the gap to help children graduate from reading Bible picture books to actually digesting Scripture. And while it is not a homeschool "curriculum", it would certainly adapt well as a Bible curriculum, especially if your family enjoys the New Living Translation. On the other hand, children this age are incredibly impressionable. They are thinking and absorbing so much. It is time to sharpen up on your theology. I have read some Bible storybooks where the stories are retold in a way that uses soft theology or even sways the story by adding (or omitting) details to the original text. The mere fact that someone picks and chooses only certain Bible stories to retell means that the person has at least some control of what the final presentation looks like. In this book, Carolyn Larsen has condensed the Scripture to retell each story, but (as you can see from the one example above) she is merely eliminating details that may cause a young brain (or even my old brain) to scatter and wander. It brings the story focus, and keeps the truth. Larsen has taken the opportunity to use the "Now What" section to tie in the big picture of the Gospel right from the beginning. For me, this is an essential element that I look for in a good book. One of the first things I did was flip to the back of the book to the stories telling of Jesus' death and resurrection and the early church. I read through the "Now What" sections looking for any details that may tell my child how or why to become saved. At first, it appeared that I wouldn't find what I was looking for. Disappointed, I flipped to Genesis. There it was. With the telling of Adam and Eve's sin, came the Gospel. Right at the beginning, exactly where it was needed. We need a Savior and here's why and here is where you can find Him.
I followed my parent’s home, even though they weren’t aware of my presense. My mom wept all the way while my dad remained silent. He begged my mom to calm down but it all fell on deaf ears. We got home to find the house filled with friends and relatives, my Dad carried my body and laid it on the mat in the living room. Prayers for forgiveness were said, and my parents were advised to stop crying as it wouldn’t bring me back. I watched my Mom cry and weep all night as she asked God why He Had to take my life.
10-12 large sage leaves, minced
Emily Cale spent the majority of her childhood as a visitor to the worlds of her favorite authors. With encouragement from her English teachers, she put pen to paper and began imagining her own stories. Preferring the fascinating lives of her characters, she majored in creative writing. When not lost in a manuscript or a good book, she enjoys crocheting, rock climbing, and playing board games. She currently lives in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, with her husband and a very spoiled cat.
Keep getting a few Spark People Live meetings under my belt every week. The accountability, information, and friendship is exactly what I need to continue being successful.
Hewlett-Packard (HP) had the biggest stand with separate areas for PCs and printers.
life in excess of what we can manage or control,
“Can’t I keep my underwear?” asked Olivia.
We had lots of snack food for the evening.
For around $144 US dollars, you too can experience your own sensory awakening.
Yeah. This is most definitely going to be a challenge. I'm thinking about posting this photo on fb and suggesting it's food. It's somewhat believable - I do hail from the deep South. So wrong. So, so wrong. I meant, me.
You fight fascism, but you are the fascist,
Respect your partnership with providence.
It is relatively obvious that certain international business pursuits are more likely to influence environmental conditions. These types of businesses need to be especially concerned about the fashion in which they conduct business. They must assure citizens that the environment will not be tarnished for decades to come. I have no qualms about them facilitating business in an international setting, but they need to make sure that the environment doesn’t become degraded as a result of their organizational operations.
But she admitted it’s getting increasingly more difficult to keep the campaign going. Neither she nor her partner, Dave Mahon, have been able to work since Amy disappeared, but they have spent a fortune. “How much?” I ask. “Oh, easily over €200,000,” she replies. She tells me that Dave was able to check his mobile phone and see that he alone has spent €10,000 on credit for it since January 2008.
God's promises:
I have recently become aware of a theory that suggests as we move closer towards 21st December 2012, Earth’s timelines converge and we essentially get down to only two timelines. Timeline 1 which is positive and results in the New World/Golden Age and timeline 2 which results in the New World Order controlling this planet. We are apparently on timeline 1. Can the Nine shed any light on this theory?
Fruit Salad
“Have you seen Steven yet?” A woman asked us as she walked into our building. We gave her a confused look, pretending to have no idea what she was talking about. Acting at its finest. ”I guess Steven Seagal is shooting a show here,” she explained. We had her fooled. Can anyone say Oscar?!
It's been a while - since December, in fact - since I pulled out the brew equipment. Well, with the return of summer, and my recently purchased, though not yet assembled MLT, the time has come to make some beer. Now, the little Brew Devil inside of me is pulling me in a few different ways, and I have a couple of obligations to previously conjured brews, so the brew schedule is filling up fast. Here's a quick run down.
But all is not so well in a number of other cases. Holt paid debut novelist Jed Rubenfeld $800,000 for The Interpretation of Murder, gave away 10,000 advance-review copies, conducted a major publicity blitz, and did a first printing of 185,000 copies. The book was published almost six months ago, and, at last report, had moved about 26,000 copies. I calculate that Mr. Rubenfeld’s unearned portion of the $800,000 is roughly $732,400.
Even though it's not the end, it's fitting that today's Friday Update deals exclusively with ends. More specifically, savage backsides; superior posteriors made extra savage through hard, heavy training. And today of all days is an explosion of gluteal savagery, booty awesomeness, and asses that just plain go POW. Huge thanks to all the contributors, such as Lift Big Eat Big, and all you savage, savage ladies who helped make today a Callipygian Cornucopia.
For those who wish to pursue an education in health care of any variety you can typically find an online health care degree program that will suit your requirements for distance learning. Colleges with very prestigious names these days are offering online learning experiences in a wide variety of health disciplines to the student.
Men — 1. Jeff Simon; 2. Simon Cho; 3. Travis Jayner; 4. Anthony Lobello; 5. Jonathan Garcia; 6. Kyle Uyehara.
37. Approximately 7.5% of all office documents get lost.
Halooooooo from 30,000 ft! Thanks to the wonders of high altitude wifi I can blog and fly at the same time - Wooo Hooooo!
Up and down 1st Saddle. Timed it perfectly as light snowflakes chased me all the way down the mountain and shortly after I got back to my bike and returned to my apartment the snowstorm had started in earnest.
The life of the party.
20-something: It’s 1 a.m. on a Tuesday, we’re still up! We’ll sleep when we’re dead!
Global Markets Direct Report Coverage 6
Cappucino, Espresso and Caffe Corretto add to the coffee section of Italian recipes. Italian desserts ar also extremely popular non only in Italy but throughout the world for their delicate flavors and delectable taste. Some of the famous Italian desserts are Spumoni, Cannoli and Granitas.
In any case, Cameron is looking thoroughly decent, if a bit foppish, on social issues. One could even consider voting for him (if one lived in Whitney), except for the fact that he is utterly, unforgivably, wrong on the economy.
Reaching goals requires motivation. ZenHabits does a nice job of explaining motivation, as well as ways to achieve it and sustain it during times of struggle. To find out more about motivation, check out the self-motivation quiz from Mindtools. After the quiz, there is a nice explanation of factors involved in self-motivation including: self-confidence and efficacy, positive thinking, focus, and environment. The author from the article How Self-Motivated Are You noted, “Self-motivation doesn’t come naturally to everyone. And even those who are highly self-motivated need some extra help every now and then. Build your self-motivation by practicing goal-setting skills, and combining those with positive thinking, the creation of powerful visions of success, and the building of high levels of self-efficacy and self-confidence.”
For this also there is no technological or large-scale solution. Perhaps, as they believe, the most conscientiously up-to-date people can easily do without local workshops and stores, local journalism, a local newspaper, a local post office, all of which supposedly have been replaced by technologies. But what technology can replace personal privacy or the coherence of a family or a community? What technology can undo the collateral damages of an inhuman rate of technological change?
Datin Noraini Hussin, wife of the Sarawak Minister for Infrastructure Development, Daud bin Abdul Rahman, is one such shining example. She is a Director of Eastbourne Corporation Bhd, which has just celebrated it 20th year as one of the most successful construction companies in Sarawak.
I’d sit up ’til 4 or 5 in the morning, cross legged on the floor hunched over my work, then grab an hours sleep and head off to uni, Man! Being young was awesome! (All those nights paid off though as I ended up winning best folio from our graduating year. Go me!).
Yeah, and just like Disney World, America is inhabited by Mickey Mouse would-be leaders. Like Mike Huckabee.
Sure, Obama’s Ivy League, proud and brave, but Godfather’s Pizza’s the flag I proudly wave,
“You don’t see it?” asked Ann.
Dow Jones 201,002 7,899,379
We plan on doing a lot more than just sending out postcards together. We plan on expanding our communities knowledge of the opportunities that exist in the Children's Market beyond Children's books. But I'll talk more about that in part 2 of this article!!! Until then feel free to browse our website and give input! We'd love to hear from you!
Apparently we aren’t the only ones who are connectivity-deprived on the Island – the line to get in and get online starts at about 9 on a Tuesday morning (the library is heartlessly closed on Sunday and Monday) with people flopped about the lawn looking listless and bereft. Then the doors open promptly at 10 and everybody pours into the adorable edifice on 58 North Summer Street.
“The Limit is a wonderful book. This glimpse into a possible future becomes all the more frightening because of Landon’s incredibly developed characters and setting, making the whole experience feel all too real. Fast paced, full of great humor, adventure, and surprises, this is sure to be enjoyed by all ages.”
8. The Addams Family (Main Title) - Vic Mizzy
The gentleman I took the class from has a unique perspective on family. He grew up in an orphanage run by Catholic Nuns. He had an older brother who was in a different section of the orphanage. On occasion, his mother would come visit him for a weekend, he says when her conscience got the better of her. So, even in the pecking order of the orphanage, he wasn't a "true" orphan, because he had a mother. She just didn't want to visit very often. So, the better socks and clothes went to the "true" orphans, the ones who had no one.
One of the things that I am really enjoying about this light is how it casts upwards. It really makes the room feel larger and I love the warm light from the bulbs (our dimmer switch that we installed a while ago also really helps). This is what it looks like right now as I type this blog up.
Blaze by Stephen King
But as our journey began to unfold, God laid it on our hearts to be open to adopt children that others have looked over. Although initially intimidated at the thought of the unknown, we began asking questions. Lots and lots of questions. And for those who are still walking the elephant to the door, here is what we discovered;
Then Tuesday my best friend and I want to get our kids together before I head downtown for the conference starting Wednesday Morning.
quite a few people asked if annie and i were sisters.
I turned to my computer, salivating at the thought of entertainment. Clicking the internet icon brought a window up just like that. I began to type, each letter appearing near the top of my screen. Within seconds I should be entertained, I thought as I hit enter.
The BHA has written to all the riders concerned and expressed their disappointment at the conduct of riders at the start, especially bearing in mind that considerable emphasis was placed on this aspect of the race during the pre-race Jockey’s Briefing. In showing disregard to the instructions of the Starter, the riders placed those on the ground assisting with the start in a potentially dangerous situation.
anti-masonry through anti-masonic almanacs, 1827-1837
“For Joshua drew not his hand back, wherewith he stretched out the spear, until he had utterly destroyed all the inhabitants of Ai.”
After all, this is no ordinary "comeback". This is a man that was among the best high school sprinters/hurdlers in the country (10.36/13.66) when he graduated in 2000 (= #4 in both events). He then went to the University of Tennessee where he won back to back NCAA sprint doubles as a frosh/soph and set a National Collegiate Record for 200 meters (19.86). He then went pro and following injury in his first pro season came back to win the Olympic 100 meter title in Athens (9.85) and then a sprint double in Helsinki (9.88/20.00) in very inclement weather. The follow up was an equaling of the then WR of 9.77 for 100 meters early the next season.
Watching my children and the aspirations that they have got me thinking. When do children stop aspiring to be heros? Ask any boy what he wants to be when he grows up and you’re likely to be answered with things like firefighter, police officer, super hero, doctor. I’ve yet to meet a child who dreamed of being an accountant, lawyer, or sanitation engineer(though to be fair, my kids get really excited when the garbage truck comes rolling past our house). There is nothing wrong with any of the professions I’ve just mentioned, and I think they’re all equally important. Perhaps we feel as we grow older that if we can’t be super heros, then why bother trying? That, and being a super hero isn’t a real job. A number of people are quite keen to pitch in around the community, or help someone on the side of the highway with a flat tire. We generally stop actively looking for people to help though.
Klimt travelled little but trips to
... no youngsters amongst the ranks.
Sophie Lisa Beresford
(“My perfume carries with it the force of desire.” – Lolita Lempicka)
Well, we never made that myrtle. The problem wasn’t the hogs busting us. It was the coyote. One old mangy dog was loitering around the herd. These pigs were big enough not to be bothered by a pesky song dog, but they certainly took notice of him after he caught wind of our activities and bounded away. The coup de grace, though, were the turkeys. A couple hens were holding sentry and naturally took off when they saw us, taking the finally-frightened hogs with them. Wild pigs don’t have the best sense of sight, but they’re wary enough to recognize something amiss. (And how strange is it to find a coyote, hogs, and turkeys hanging around each other outside of a Disney movie?)
Due to formatting restrictions on the blog, all poems should be left justified. Unfortunately I am unable to publish indentations or shaped poems.
Benefits of Good Cutting Tools
3. I Touched a Rock
Anyway, I haven’t been able to visit the lovely blogs on blogosphere and telling the oh-so-many talented bloggers out there how much I love their recipes and posts. I am sorry. I truly am. I also have been very lazy with replying to the lovely people who have been leaving comments on my blog. I know its the rudest thing possible, but please know each and every comment you leave makes my day.
Silver stages, golden curtains, filled my head plain as could be
In addition to the above payments, the licensee may have to pay separately for specific technical services the licensor may provide in connection with the licence. These may be considered under three main headings (a) training programmes for licensees personnel, (b) specific technical services performed in the licensor`s works and facilities, such as special drawings, and (c) technical experts supplied by the licensor to the licensee’s plant.
On days that I need to complete a lot I will set my timer for 15 minutes and work on one task for the full 15 minutes. I will stop that task when the timer goes off and move on to another task. This usually happens on good days, where the pain is tolerable. I will work on one task, for example, clearing clutter in one room, then I move to 15 minutes doing computer work, then 15 minutes cleaning a focus zone, then 15 minutes reading. I try to alternate from something physical to something sedentary, and including a 15 minute "break" every third 15 minute session. This is what I call my 15 minute day, and I find that I am most productive these days.
Before I get lost in embarrassingly worshipful paeans about the pieces on Axl Rose (“with the wasp-man sunglasses and the braids and the goatee, he reminds one of the monster in Predator, or of that monster’s wife on its home planet”) and Michael Jackson (“a god moves through him; the god enters, the god leaves”) and the rest, let me stop and explain.
Here it is. The real purpose of the visit to Pho 68. Pho with rare beef and braised beef. It looked the part, and tasted it too. They've got the makings of a really good pho here. The stock was excellent. Deep, aromatic and intensely savoury. Wafer thin slices of beef were rare on arrival but cooked through as time progressed, the gentle poaching keeping them tender. The braised beef (brisket I think) was also sliced thin, but had a stronger, minerally flavour. The tendon running through it was soft and gelatinous speaking of long, slow cooking. The noodles, save for a little gluey clump at the top, were cooked just right.
Now that I can feel that sense of “enough” in my body, and I can trust it enough to take action around it, I don’t struggle nearly as much with the wants, desires, and wishes that used to plague me. I know what is enough. For most of my life, for most things in my life, I have enough. I am enough. There is enough.
The particular BlackBerry Curve Third generation capabilities a 2.46 inch TFT monitor which provides great in screen image thanks to approximately 65K colours staying displayed. For quickness connected with text message admittance, a new complete Texting keyboard will be offered as well as the touch delicate optical track pad, which usually presents the thumb handled suggests regarding navigating food selection inside the Blackberry mobile phones 6.0 UI.
My memoir on adopting my daughter from China was perhaps the hardest thing I ever wrote mainly because at the same time that I was trying to understand what was going on, what this sudden unexpected journey in the middle of my life actually meant, to capture in words what it actually felt like– I was trying to get others to understand, to feel all of this at the same time.
It isn’t a hiding place. It is a finding place.
Character Designer: Oyari Ashiato (he reformed to tenco when his previous company Littlewitch went kaput), Shimada Fumikane, BLADE and more about 7 more
Im a few hours late in posting, I had to start and finish my Christmas shopping last night when Jas got home home from work. I was BEAT by the time we got home last night so I had Domonic pick a winner this morning. I couldnt get a picture because I cant find my battery charger and I have NOOOOOO idea how to upload pics from my phone.
Maybe they’ll come back to me again tonight. Fingers crossed.
I really wanted to give the quilter the ability to use their stash but also allow them to go shopping. Who wouldn't want to have some of the newest cutest fabrics in their scrap quilt? It was VERY HARD for me to STOP buying fabric. I kept telling myself, “Ooooh! Wouldnʼt this be cute? I have to have a bit of this!” I actually used over 150+ fabrics in this quilt. I hope you have fun playing with your stash and adding the newest cutest fabrics to your quilt.
Two hours before serving, bring it back to room temperature and slice using a knife dipped in hot water so you get a neat slice.
Allow my tranquil self to return
One of Geras' guest writers is British professor Eve Garrard, who in her latest post takes on writers Fintan O'Toole, from Ireland, and Iain Banks, from the UK. OK, none of these people is particularly famous as a Middle East commenter, but I'm concerned about arguments, especially when they're often repeated in essentially the same form. Garrard:
Are you seeing more or less birds this time of year?
In celebration of Black History Month, the MHS Library Media Center has designed a display that pays tribute to the African Americans who have struggled to bring equality to America. Stop in and learn something new about these incredible figures.
I don’t know what more to say… I have a lot of projects in my head. I want to start working with new design, modelling, etc. computer programs and improve skills with the old ones. I want to write more technology related stuff. I want to make clothes and start doing accessories. I want to improve my make up skills and make tutorials to help others. I want to live more useful life and write about it.
the cloud die is a Doo Hickey by Magnolia and the sentiment is by Stampavie,
Can you tell from my reviews recently that it is getting colder outside? I truly love this time of year for beer. Don't get me wrong I love a good APA or IPA in the summer, but even more I enjoy a fine stout or porter during the colder months of the year. I've got a few bottles of this beer and this is my first one in a very long time for review. I am enjoying this beer while watching my Alma Mater Ball State keep their win streak alive against Miami of Ohio.
I'm No Picasso added a response to it, with an interesting post about the way women in Kpop videos these days are taking on the Male Gaze directly - with Hyuna as a prime example of that - rather than pretending it isn't there.
Ho poi scoperto che è la stessa casa degli occhiali di Lady Gaga, che personalmente non mi fanno impazzire...
Mitch Glaser
2) When there’s something heavy to be moved.
Another website says that "as a result, many people nowadays suffer from the over-acidification of their body, also known as acidosis." In addition, they claim that "symptoms of a pH imbalance can be weight problems such as overweight and underweight, as well as other health conditions such as allergies, arthritis, acne and heart attacks."
After nearly coming to grief in an uncovered water meter cavity we turned into the pedestrian walkway, where the pavement surfaces were level and safe, only to narrowly avoid being run down by two men on motor scooters.....the municipal police, protecting the public.
Biologists generally agree, however that one feature above all others defines the orchid and differentiates it from virtually all other flowering plants – the fusion of the male portion of the flower (stamens) and the female portion (pistils). Orchid flowers are pollinated by a great variety of flying animals, and their diversity in floral structure has resulted from adaptations to various pollinators. About half the orchid species are pollinated by bees; moths, butterflies, flies, birds, and other agents pollinate the rest. Many orchid flowers are adapted for pollination by a single species of insect.
Admiral Ororod did not garner the complete respect of those under him; he had connections, came from a well-to-do family with important political ties, more a bureaucrat with aspirations for a political career than a military career, he ran his detachment more like a business than the military unit it was. He may have been far from the most inspirational of fleet officers, but his politically minded motivations also helped to ensure that the Orion was one of the top training vessels in all the fleet.
Fine. I look for that school in the phonebook…. no school.
Whether your recent bizarre policy decisions are driven by a fear of Islam or a woeful lack of Islamic understanding remains unclear, but to most impartial observers it would appear you have crossed the loyalty line and are now officially endorsing sharia law in Britain.
Stomachs dropped at the images of Justice, a mixed breed puppy that was doused in lighter fluid and set ablaze earlier this month. He had second and third-degree burns over 70 percent of his body and died 10 days later.
"So to hear Archbishop Hart discouraging any recognition of this commitment is extraordinary and heartless."
2. Ngoni Makusha NCAA 100 Victory – Nothing like a great 100 to thrill the senses, and this was such a race. Channeling the spirits of Bob Hayes, Carl Lewis and Donovan Bailey, the slow starting Makusha blazed through the middle of the pack for the win in an NCAA record 9.89!
of the Seven Samurai, battling
Customer reviews & ratings of Canon EOS 7D 9 Lens Deluxe Kit with EF-S 18-55mm f/3.5-5.6 IS II Zoom Lens & EF 75-300mm f/4-5.6 III Telephoto Zoom Lens + Canon 50mm 1.8 Lens + 16GB Deluxe Accessory Kit + 3 Year are available at the merchant’s website, see it by visit the link below.
Nov-13 Seattle, WA KeyArena On Sale Soon
Person of Interest. Started out good, then fell flat. Can't say why.
Executive summary: Guys and Dolls
If I had a majority of 29 seats in Parliament and me and my ministers were actually “Serving the People”, I’d have nothing to worry about….I wouldn’t need to hold 3 public meetings in one week, deploy hundreds of people on websites and generally look like I’ve been caught with my underwear around my ankles!
Here are the Deets for TCP Tuesday.
Looking forward to having to push the gas pedal in my car barefooted.
Goldstein AO, Kincade JE, Gamble G, Bearman RS. Policies and practices for improving influenza immunization rates among healthcare workers. Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 2004; 25: 908-911.
The meal was simple to produce, and lovely to eat.
The warmer temps prompted me pull out Megan's warm weather clothes.
Mendy, as much as I, found this almost too good to be true and a bit hard to believe, even though all sorts of wonderful beings show up in her office all the time. As she said later, though, she has a great deal of experience with this stuff and she feels confident of being able to sniff out a fraud. Stephen did not appear to be a fraud, not to either of us. I had a feeling of the sublime, no sense of anything that might raise an alarm.
With gravy?
Use for how long: 5 Days’ use.
Anyway, I thought it would be fun to keep this one under raps... a secret project that would only be revealed once it was complete! I have hinted a few times that I had something special in mind for my dining area- and this was it! Check out this earlier post I did about mirrors on the wall... you can see where I pulled my inspiration from easily!
Last week saw another turn of direction for the brand with the news that the Genii Capital-owned F1 team has terminated its sponsorship agreement with Group Lotus. Financial uncertainty has surrounded Group Lotus since the investment arm of the Malaysian Government, Khazanah, selling its near on 43 percent stake in Lotus parent company Proton, to another Malaysian entity, DRB-Hicom. Those famous insiders surfaced in various reports saying that the sale of Proton was a contributing reason for Genii cancelling its sponsorship agreement.
“DON’T PICK UP WHAT YOU CAN’T KNOCK OFF!”
GPS with A GPS
Ring on color - circle from itty bitty punch pieces around standard hole punch hole
After a few minutes walk forwards again and upon reaching the glass once more turn 90% as you push yourself back into the room you started. When back slowly turn and bring your mirror self/reflection back towards you. Breathe slowly , relax and return to the everyday reality of 3D bubble land. this may take some practice before you get it right, but after a while you will.
Seems to be the case that for some reason, the Left (as I'll call them here), have been brainwashed into thinking the EDL are a violent Nazi group. My experience is that it's the UAF that are against free speech, human rights and are willing to let this country go to the dogs! If you believe in democracy, why do you protest at anybody else's parade, demo or whatever?
We stood outside their house and hugged and prayed over them. I held each of them tight until they cried. They needed a mother's love and protection and the feel of safet, if only for a moment. I kissed them all over their faces and told them I loved them and we would see them again, and help them in the meantime. Isabelle and Johnny begged to give them all the food we had in the van, so we asked them to walk back with us. We walked down that path to the van, praying the whole way. I didn't know until later that night after looking at the pictures that we were all holding hands. Isabelle and Johnny love these girls too, and their hearts were broken and changed that day too.
Stepney, an anonymous poster on the Vote-2007 forum – but almost certainly not Alex Stepney the former Manchester United goalkeeper, notes,
At first, Rebecca Smith was relieved when she got a phone call from an FBI agent. It was October, just a few months after Smith had spent $30,000 on a real estate investment. The woman who sold her the deal, Karen Hanover, hadn’t come through on any of her promises, and Smith was worried.
My mom found a pair of these adorable tree trunk side tables at Goodwill for $15. They had weird rectangular black glass tops and the tables themselves were all chipped up.
And in the meantime, since I can't build a Time Machine and go back to school and get a different degree, I spend some of my time trying to get as much education as I can on subjects about communication and language as I try to understand why my son has such a problem with his. Came across this today and thought I would share.
After New Year's, we changed over the outside Christmas decorations to Winter decorations.
About Universal Studios Home Entertainment
It was so cute. SOOOOO CUTE. Take a look at this photo, which I didn't want to copy here because it's copyrighted, to get an idea of the cuteness of this mouse. It was about the size of a quarter. No wonder I couldn't see it when I checked Laverne's mouth for trophies. It was all the way in her mouth.
What happens when the characters from our classics go modern and meets erotica? This series is going to find out!
Tomorrow there will be another day filled with sneak peeks.
2 smallish aubergines (about 400g/1lb.)
Luke 1:76-79
Benson’s painful emotions continue to flow: “When all your friends abandon you/when things get rough/take care of yourself like you would the ones you love,” he begs in “The Ones You Love.”
Last but certainly not least is Katie from Miss Dixie! Katie was kind enough to agree to post even though she just went on a trip of her own last weekend, too! Her blog is full of shopping tidbits, interiors, and many other things but my favorite part about her blog is all of the personal touches she adds. You should see how she decorated her laundry room and how gorgeous her wedding was. But seriously, if you haven't seen them go right now. Thank you again Katie, you're the best!
when the rubber meets the road, in between my toes
ላቤን ጠብ አድርጌ
‘’’He spoke of how modern architecture is international not culture-specific and that it is big concerns that commission large projects. They are in the service of commerce.’’’
The Rally Fighter was prototyped in the workshop at the back of the Wareham office, but manufacturing muscle also came from Factory Five Racing, a kit-car company and Local Motors investor located just down the road. Of course, the kit-car business has been around for decades, standing as a proof of concept for how small manufacturing can work in the car industry. Kit cars combine hand-welded steel tube chassis and fiberglass bodies with stock engines and accessories. Amateurs assemble the cars at their homes, which exempts the vehicles from many regulatory restrictions (similar to home-built experimental aircraft). Factory Five has sold about 8,000 kits to date.
We’ve done a load of work at the White Horse previously (see Rounds 1, 2, 3, 4) but we were asked back to go over a wall that we’ve done previously (that was looking a little grubby due to the addition of some low-grade graffiti), freshen up the gents toilet door, take care of a tall wall beside the bar and also throw in a few little extras scattered around the place. The White Horse is one of our favourite local boozers so working there is always good fun and design-wise we’ve obviously run with the whole White Horse identity but given it a little id-iom twist.
I'm gonna drive everybody wild
Yet let us analyze these implications in their general form. Starting with an increase in extreme weather, the erosion of soils and weak rock will increase. This will cause more of the imposing landmasses to crumble into the sea leading to an even greater rise in sea level. The changes will exponentially become more and more unpredictable. A chaotic patter will emerge which can never be studied. People will panic, but the plain fact is that nature is beyond their control. Sea levels will rise, temperatures will spike, and weather will be out of control. Everything will seem to be pointing toward an inevitable apocalypse.
When I do manage to read a book its usually non-fiction.
Sakura gelly roll pen in white for highlies
Question 2:
When Prime Minister John Major reflected on his country, he was subjected to ridicule, but what he said resonated with the majority of English people, the main exception being the liberal/leftists whose central role in life appears to be the destruction of all that we hold dear.
Icarus (IK-uh-rus)
“They can slice it any way they want, but this pie isn’t getting any bigger.”
I spent this past weekend at a retreat at the Seabeck Conference Center. I had to smile as I drove into Seabeck. The business district, if I don’t count the Conference Center, consists of only about a half a dozen buildings, but when I arrived in town I was greeted by a small gray building with a bright blue door. White trim around the window caused the red “Espresso” sign to pop. I decided to go inside. The usual rows of flavors were lined up on a shelf; an espresso machine and a barista were visible from behind a tiny counter. Five or six wooden stools filled the remaining floor space– stools that were all occupied by the locals. They are a generous lot. I discovered that they will tease anyone. They didn’t penalize me for being a visitor; locals and visitors are all teased alike.
Divina F – TwoCents Reviewer
I’m not saying every Christian should have voted for Barack Obama. However, I am saying that nobody should vote for a candidate because of a single issue, especially such a complicated issue such as abortion.
Fracking up the ground water. That’s a big deal, and when the oil’s been pumped out and the money dries up and the towns are poisoned for who knows how many decades and abandoned, all the Big Guys are going to say is “Oops, we’re sorry…. No, I meant to say, What are you talking about? There’s no proof that we had anything to do with this.”
"This is fucking boring," he said, sounding thoroughly fed up, "kiss chase, why don't we have a game of kiss chase?"
P: Does your Mom or Dad make you do chores?
Although Emily knows her math facts fairly well, she could stand to improve her speed, so I was interested to see how Math Rider would stack up against other programs we’ve tried. It teaches mastery of all 4 math operations with numbers 1-12 and is designed for children ages 6-12. To play, the child begins a “quest.” A short story scenario is given, then the child rides his or her horse, “Shadow,” across deserts, mountains, and so on. Math problems appear at the bottom of the screen. As the problem is answered, the horse jumps over an obstacle. If the problem is missed, the horse stops while the game gives the correct answer. The problems and speed are adjusted to the child’s abilities, with problems the child has trouble with generated more frequently.
Seeing as I know so much of the story already, why can’t I leave the first page for now and just get on with the rest?
“Officer,” Chris said, “can you aim your light up on that roof?” The officer turned the beam to the roof and searched. “There’s a dark spot on the right side. See it? About two feet wide?”
I had a lot of issues with the title. Nothing seemed right and after putting 2 different styles down, I decided to use a stamp from Finishing Touch Ideas with a ink that went well with the paper. The paint under it really lifted the title.
That's it. There aren't really any short cuts. People always want short cuts. New acts often want to know how to get an agent. The chances are that any act asking how to get an agent doesn't really need an agent. And when they're at a stage where an agent can help them, they'll find there are agents there offering to help. That's how it works.
The guru, or ācāryadeva, as we learn from the bona fide scriptures, delivers the message of the absolute world, the transcendental abode of the Absolute Personality, where everything nondifferentially serves the Absolute Truth. We have heard so many times: mahājano yena gataḥ sa panthāḥ (“Traverse the trail which your previous ācārya has passed”), but we have hardly tried to understand the real purport of this śloka. If we scrutinizingly study this proposition, we understand that the mahājana is one, and the royal road to the transcendental world is also one. In the Muṇḍaka Upaniṣad (1.2.12) it is said:
I went to the front desk and explained what happened and luckily they did give us a room (it would have been a long trip home!). We got the same type of room, same rate, but it was a handicapped accessible room. They probably hold those rooms back in case they are needed. I don't know yet if I got charged for our missed night. I had reserved the room with a card that I subsequently canceled (due to fraud). So I don't know if they would have been able to charge it or not.
When we allow ourselves to let go of wanting the other to fill us up, when we let ourselves be real, as we are, another energy comes through our body and being. It will charge our entire being with a presence, a force that is absolutely free of wanting. We feel open, grounded, free, humble and powerful – zero and everything. It is as through our body, heart and soul simultaneously flower in reverential awe of the moment. This force is an exquisite expression of the flower of life itself.
After Hal kills Hotspur, he eulogizes him thus:
Because children are the same as they’ve ever been.
I recommend that Hull-Aylmer MP Nycole Turmel continue her work as our interim leader until a permanent successor is elected.
* The low ASA of the collodion pretty much forces a portrait exposure to be between two seconds and six seconds. This, to me, forces a very distinct similarity of portraiture, no matter the photographer.
"9 Coolest Literary Siblings" by Rose King
Down the chimney St. Nicholas came with a bound.
Sometimes when you plan a project, it doesn't go exactly as expected. In keeping with my writing goals for 2011 I planned to write and publish this book in four months. It actually took 12.
.HOW I FEEL NOW.
This eyeshadow is called 27 브론즈 스파클 (bronze sparkle) and I would describe it as a really beautiful bronzey-gold with gold sparkles. The eyeshadow goes on fairly iridescent, but is definitely buildable and suitable for darker bronzey looks.
Preheat oven to 500 F. In small bowl, mix butter and garlic, set aside. Roll dough out into a 12" circle on parchment paper. Spread butter and garlic mix over dough. Sprinkle with parmesan followed by mozzarella cheeses. Transfer parchment and dough to pizza stone or baking sheet. Bake 9-10 min.
1 (14.75 oz) can cream style corn
So much better. I kept the white console table my dad built for me and moved it across the room. The huge rolling pin is vintage and was a gift from my hubby. :) The mint growing in the chocolate terra cotta container is orange mint and smells so good!
I used paper from My Minds Eye-Playful Posies paper stack. I cut the shape at 4.39 x 9.66 using my gypsy to weld the shape together. The frame layer is cut at 4.39 x 4.91 which I embossed with the polka dots folder. I distressed the edges with Tim Holtz distress ink-old paper.
So we’re forced – to squeeze every drop from the cards we played already, to stop wishing, to stop mourning – to just play. But what happens when we can’t?
Tennessee invoked the rule for the 1975 season, during the time when the maximum number of scheduled games was eleven. That season, the Vols traveled to Honolulu for their 12th scheduled game, winning 28-6. There were four non-conference games at home on the schedule that season — Maryland, North Texas State, Colorado State, and Utah – with a fifth on the road (UCLA). I don’t know which of those four home NC games was the extra one added due to the Hawaii game. I hope it wasn’t North Texas State — the worst Volunteer loss I personally ever witnessed.
Washington Nationals/Montreal Expos - Ike's Cards
Singer Dionne Warwick showed that the way to San Jose isn’t the only thing she’s not familiar with, as she pawed in bewilderment at the cash register. Actress and deaf person Marlee Matlin conveniently forgot a lifetime of lip-reading so she could have a sign-language interpreter serve as a go-between in case anyone was tempted to yell at her. Supermodel Niki Taylor tossed pizza dough into the air, actually catching it on the way down a few times.
For the stock: add all ingredients to a soup pot. Pick off all the chicken that you want to eat. Put everything else in the pot. Cook about 35 to 45 minutes. Remove chicken bones, skin, etc. from pot. Remove and discard bay leaves and anything else. You should have approximately 3 quarts of stock. (Again, if you just buy chicken stock you can skip this whole apart)
The Woman in the Window
The American Wind Energy Association statistics show Texas leading in U.S. wind resource measurements and predict that wind power “could provide 19 times the state’s current electricity needs.”
Together we are making each other better people, every day :)
How did you come to know Jesus as your Savior?
One large skillet with high sides and a lid to match
By Phoebe Sakarombe
Left Hand Brewing Company Twin Sisters Double IPA
2. Sherlock Holmes
Things have definitely CHANGED since we last went bowling.
So doctor said that since we have battled his allergy problems for so long we need to get down to the nitty gritty on his allergies. He ordered bloodwork. They took 3 viles of blood that day at the office. I almost passed out. Ethan rocked!
-kit lenses
From the Embellishment Add-On:
I watched the animals eat the jungle
Food: Thor brings in some outside snacks and sweet treats, none of which are vegan.
Please call Finance's Outreach Unit at 212-669-8745 for more information.
Writing stories of such a concise length makes you think about the importance of every single word, and is a great exercise to improve your writing skills. So get thinking and get writing. And whilst you’re at it, get looking at the official National Flash-Fiction Competition.
Sarah Whitmire
It’s better to burn out
’cause when I feel good, I
Given NuLabour's visceral hatred and contempt for the white working class, who's interests so often conflicts with those now much preferred groups, many observers would have assumed that Denham was either making a bad joke and had forgotten the punchline, or was suffering from some catastrophic mental breakdown, had they, that is, not realised that an election is imminent.
The verdict? More likely to attract shoppers than Sir Can-A-Lot but a little too futuristic to be relevant in today’s economy. Also, without ads it’s missing a crucial selling point.
Buckinghamshire based Alt. Rockers Young Guns are the headliners for The Big Cheese Cave on Sunday 15th July. Despite being relatively early in their musical career, Young Guns can lay claim to to sell out headline shows around the UK, high profile support slots with artists such as Bon Jovi and Lostprophets, magazine covers and even an appearance on The Main Stage at Reading Festival
The “LEGO® Architecture: Towering Ambition” exhibit, with the additional models and the LEGO® play area, is on view through this Labor Day, September 3, 2012 (as mentioned earlier). The National Building Museum is open seven days a week, from 10 am to 5 pm Monday through Saturday and 11 am to 5 pm on Sunday. Admission fees do apply.
Lately I’ve been digging the Los Gatos Creek Trail for my long runs. Even though you are still in the middle of a heavily populated area, parts of the trail make you feel like you are in the middle of nowhere.
I know that she loves and adores me.I love all you gals too.
Those who see the injustice of the CDF’s attempt to suppress LCWR need to respond with similar courage. Now is not the time to be afraid, worried, or despairing. We must rely on our God who promised to be with us and guide us in our times of need. The only thing we can ever change is ourselves and our responses, not other people or situations. We have the choice at this juncture to respond with courage.
After compiling a passel of such non-animation and not exclusively cartoon images, I have decided to launch them on their own blog: "Pacific SplendorLAnd", where they will not interfere with the winnowing but still vaguely animation-related ramblings here.The main thing I have enjoyed about doing these pieces is that they wind up being singular, self-contained compositions, as opposed to quick fragmented doodles on the one end of the spectrum; or artwork created as a stream of storytelling devices, such as a storyboard or an animation sequence on the other. So somehow this makes them want their own blog.
The race organisers couldn’t help the weather, but there was a lot throughout the day which showed that given the warning they had about the likelihood of poor weather, they could have performed a whole heap better than they did. This became abundantly clear from the start as only one entrance to the stadium was open though two were advertised in the programme – this meant all runners trying to get in and out through one gate. Pandemonium. At about this time – still with half an hour to go – organisers were trying to chivee everyone out of the stadium to start lining up at the start in the cold and wet.
Developing stories
Also, big thanks to Badaude who shared her amazing art, recently featured in the Times (need a subscription to read the article), with JNSQ! This map is so freaking cool I think I stared at it for 20 min in awe. You are my blogger super-star of the week!!!
If you buy into the idea of an economic collapse that allows some sort of plausible, individualistic retreat scenario, you are probably also going to like Crawford's EMP scenarios, even if the most obvious EMP scenarios would normally include enough regular style nukes to melt the planet.
Note that Botach's contact person is Michael Diveroli, Efraim's father.
In a small saucepan over medium heat, combine the apple cider vinegar, balsamic vinegar, maple syrup, ketchup, red onion, garlic and chile. Stir and let simmer, uncovered, for about an hour. Increase the heat to medium-high and cook for 15 more minutes until the sauce thickens. Stir it often. If it seems too thick, add some water.
In all, 14 players missed at least one game because of the probe with seven being ruled out for the entire year. An eighth was cleared to return at midseason but decided to redshirt.
And look...﻿
you miss half the fun of getting there.
She is taking her ugly duckling status hard. She shrieks her Skeksis complaint call at everyone and everything. The serama have taken to hiding from her, and even the other pekins are giving her a wide berth. The newspaper on the coop floor feels the brunt of her temper, and she is spending a lot of time shrieking in the coop and flinging strips of mutilated broadsheet out of the pop hole door. The others wisely let her go to bed first, and only venture in to the coop when she's settled down to sleep. No one risks perching next to her. To add insult to injury, I have smothered her in mite powder as a precaution. So now she looks like a middle aged, balding goth with dandruff. It's a hard look to rock, frankly.
The time has come – finally – for somebody with a sensible agenda to intervene in the insane race now taking place across the Channel between the markets and Berlin. Not just because, if they don’t, scorched earth will be all that’s left; but also because both sides are scared – and so the time is right.
no flash, no flowers, no moving the furniture around
I finally switched on my computer (largely because I had an e-mail from a French friend that asked why there were no results) and found the HuffPo summary immediately. No surprises. Labour making gains at the government's expense - it was expected and is not unusual for local elections around half-way through a government's life. Under the Thatcher government this used to happen quite often yet the lady went on to lead her party to victory several times.
Yes and no. Ordinary sexuality dimly reflects the external appearance of this necklace; but in truth these women are the direct All-Attractive Energies (bhagavān-prākṛti), the divine goddesses, eternal manifestations of the fullness of the Absolute All-Attractive Being.
“All to Jesus I surrender, all to him I freely give, I will ever love and trust him, in his presence daily live”
Big Eyed Beans from Venus! Oh my, oh my.
Having just been exposed to tombs, mummies and the world of Hatshepsut full-throttle in a middle school text book, it seemed more fitting than ever to face the crowds and potential chaos with three kids ages 6 – 11, all in the name of seeing the real thing. And, with no more strollers or diapers to consider, it was well worth the attempt.
My kids clean up FAST. They know how to clean and when told to do so, man can they really get the job done.
If more people participate in events like this, there is a greater chance that laws will be passed to combat the issue.
I first saw this H&M snake-embossed envelope clutch weeks ago at a location in the city, fell in love (who would've thought since I hate snakes?!), but passed because I didn't have my 20% coupon with me. Days later, when I was ready to actually buy, I couldn't find it anywhere in the stores near me. This is what I get for wanting to save $4 lol. I was about to give up when I recently revisited one of the stores and saw they had restocked. Hallelujah!
I’d find Derek’s lair straight away
They were just finishing when there was a loud clap of thunder. Gareth got to his feet.
Regional Organisers should be elected by the members of that region eligible to vote and should only be dismissed from office by the voting regional members, or by their peers on the Advisory Council.
I wish everyone a blessed and happy New Year!
I was lunching at Gaylords (still there, and still terrific) in Fitzrovia with two contacts, and we were one of just four tables occupied. Afterwards, I strolled round the restaurant-packed area and spoke to some owners. Two admitted they didn’t think they’d make it through next year unless things looked up. All said their Christmas bookings were well down before around December 15th. What seemed to be depressing most of them was the total absence of any sign of improvement.
Then I noticed, the refrigerator is on the fritz, yet again. It's turned up to nine and just barely keeping things cool. The repair man kept saying he was coming. Until the manager called him again at 6pm and he said, tomorrow. The manager said, and in the meantime their food is going bad.
He also sought to break from the class-conscious conventions of the 1930s and early 40s, when top hat and tails or tuxedos were the norm, by dancing in casual or everyday work clothes, so as to make his dancing more relevant to the cinema-going public. As his first wife, actress and dancer Betsy Blair explained: “A sailor suit or his white socks and loafers, or the T-shirts on his muscular torso, gave everyone the feeling that he was a regular guy, and perhaps they too could express love and joy by dancing in the street or stomping through puddles…he democratized the dance in movies.”[14] In particular, he wanted to create a completely different image from that associated with Fred Astaire, not least because he believed his physique didn’t suit such refined elegance: “I used to envy his cool aristocratic style, so intimate and contained. Fred wears top hat and tails to the manner born — I put them on and look like a truck driver.”[2]
Terrified of messing up this parenting thing.
The biggest thing is with Oldest and her boyfriends daughter, who's 3. The mom just up and left for the 4th time, leaving the daughter with Oldest and Boyfriend. No contact for over a month! Oldest and Boyfriend went to a lawyer to see what they could do, and the lawyer said NOTHING. Yep, nothing. A judge in our county won't rule against a mom who has several domestic violence charges called to her home, who has pulled a gun on her current boyfriend several times, has a mental illness, and has had several attempted suicides!
They headed south on King’s Highway, back to the train station.
Black pepper powder - 1/2 teaspoon
Friends waiting for the limo to take them to the ball. Some lovely shots of the girls in all their finery.
#2 Fasten your paper with the image WELL. You do not want it to move AT ALL! I used a combo of pins and tape.
TranceSound.net admin/founder
The Council has spoken, the votes have been cast, and the results are in for this week's Watcher's Council match up.
How does this event foreshadow the ministry of the Levites? (As we will see later, the Levites will be chosen of all the tribes of Israel to attend to the Tabernacle and the religious service. “Then Moses said, ‘You have been set apart to the Lord today, for you were against your own sons and brothers, and he has blessed you this day.” (Exodus 32:29 NIV))
Exciting, exciting... can you believe its JUNE?! That means, to me, its summer. I feel like every month I say, "can you believe its January, May, etc?" But seriously, June is big for me. It means I've been graduated for over 1 year?!?
A hunger strike and subsequent attempt to escape are both thwarted by Warrick as he catches up with her when she is stopped at the main door.
Even though it was quite disappointing for we the children, the parents especially the mothers were happy because it spared them the trouble of waking up at dawn to cook the Ampesi, Banku, Konkonte, Mpotopoto, Tuo Zaafi (Ghanaian dishes). Did I hear you say, you sent the Fried Rice and Chicken, Potato chips and Chicken and burgers? Hmm, my dear friend, this was what I dreamt of sending to Our Day. Nevertheless, Our Day was still fun. There were lots of toffees, chocolate, biscuits, cookies, drinks and delicious food from the school’s canteen. The one who made my Our Day always memorable was one of my favourite teachers, Mr. Quartey. He was my class 5 teacher. He loved to pamper me and my squad (P.I.A – don’t ask for the meaning). It wasn’t that we were teachers’ pets but……… aha we had favour from our teachers.
Level: Clr 5, Drd 5
If you're interested in obtaining career education at a vocational or technical school, let My College Guide help. They have the information and resources you need to simplify your search for the right career education program and school.
Even more importantly I think I'm having a rebirth of my spirit. For the longest time I've basically just existed. I've done the bare minimum around the house. It's been a struggle to get that done too. But the last few weeks I've been WANTING to spread my wings and take the time to make the homemade breads and the homemade snacks. I've been wanting to do that stuff. It's almost like I'm being reborn. I don't know what has brought this about. I'm afraid to blink...afraid that it will go away if I do. I still have all the stress and depression in my life....but I'm really trying to not let it affect ME. And maybe that's the whole difference.
With Britain looking increasingly likely to secure possession of Palestine, it paved the way for the Balfour Declaration of 1917, a letter addressed to Victor's uncle, Lionel Walter Rothschild, which promised that His Majesty's government would do their utmost to establish 'a national home for the Jewish people' in Palestine. It was a 'declaration of sympathy with Jewish Zionist aspirations', and ultimately led to the creation of Israel. Today Balfour Day is celebrated there on November 2nd.
in the nation.
A huge Mango tree inhabits our side yard, ready to start dropping fruit any day now. After a particularly early cold snap for Florida last winter - I had imagined the fruits this year would be limited.
Thank you to anyone who nominated me, or put me on that shortlist. It’s an astonishing list of gifted people, and I’m very proud and startled to be on it.
Then finally, they put me on depakote. I am mentioning this drug by name because I have heard from several other women that they believe depakote was the cause of this for them too, and a doctor at a California University said that he strongly, strongly believes that it gives PCOS to young women. Then I heard that some doctors have been instructed not to prescribe it to women under 40. Depakote won't own up to that and they knowingly let the doctors prescribe it (at least, until recently from what I hear). I don't want to get into who my sources are because I don't want to get anyone in trouble. It's very good for seizures, my brother had to take it for years and it kept him alive, but for Bipolar- not so much.
Although I wasn't there(regretfully)to cheer on my very best running friends, I am in awe of their strength, determination and bravery. They headed into the worst of conditions and hung in their with their heads held high and they gave it their very, very best.
If a payment remains overdue for a set period, such as 60 or 90 days, the licensor will usually have the right to terminate the agreement without resort to arbitration. In some countries, this does not apply if the overdue payment is caused by a temporary banking or government problem.
Technique/Format: envelopes, cards and other art that can be mailed.
blood flow to anything remotely resembling
NFC West:
Anyway, one hour, one Crayola marker, one pair of scissors several straight pins, and one sewing machine later, I have this fitted pencil skirt. It's a little too short for the office, but I'm hoping the tights will hide my legs enough that no one will complain.
Maybe a better question: what makes you “make a difference” mad?
The 31-year-old Blue Valentine actress wore a sleeveless black Givenchy Fall 2012 cocktail dress with white satin trims and cascading ruffled detailed skirt. The short frock was accessorized with a black Nancy Gonzalez crocodile classic box clutch and black suede Yves Saint Laurent (YSL) ‘TribToo’ platform pumps.
trying to get Daddy off the computer and to turn the tv off and go outside more , cause I love watching him play baseball with Jack
07-14 Lisbon, Portugal – Optimus Alive
Make the Bread, Buy the Butter- Jennifer Reese
Start from today, don’t “save” anything for “special occasions”.
Let me tell you, I previously loved Gerard Butler's Phantom but Ramin Karimloo's Phantom made me want to hop through my television set, kick Christine out of the picture and run away with him on the streets of Paris. He was AMAZING with a gorgeous voice and so much raw, sexy emotion. Despite kicking her to the side for the Phantom the gorgeous Sierra Boggess was an awesome Christine with an amazingly hypnotic voice. The height of the play where they sang the theme song was filled with such romance and emotion. I also fell in love with the Music of the Night from Ramin's emotionally raw and sexy voice. I had to grab the soundtrack after to relive the experience over and over again. I simply fell in love with the production!
“The Kingdom of Gods,” N.K. Jemisin (Orbit US; Orbit UK)
3. (C) After thanking PM Meles for the meeting and noting the positive U.S.-Ethiopian relationship, Sen. Feingold asked the PM about Ethiopian plans for dealing with Somalia. Meles replied that the situation in Somalia had deteriorated significantly in the last six months. Like the Taliban in Afghanistan, the CIC had filled a political vacuum in Somalia, providing security and stability in areas that they controlled. Meles said the CIC was also riding a wave of resurgent Jihadism in the region which had been encouraged by developments in Iraq and Afghanistan. He noted that the CIC had been implementing the same brand of radical Islam espoused by other extremists, as was evidenced by their censoring of television programming and cinemas, as well as their ban on khat. Meles acknowledged that Somalis had traditionally resisted such extreme interpretations of Islam, but also remarked that Somalis "liked to back a winning horse" and Jihadists had accumulated a string of victories that was winning converts to their cause. This gathering military momentum had allowed a relatively small group of extremists to dominate the large and diverse organizations who formed the CIC. Meles said CIC leaders Sheik Aweys, Aidan Ayro and Hassan al-Turki had direct connections to Al Qaeda that were known to intelligence services, including in the U.S. He agreed with Sen. Feingold’s suggestion that the CIC could be considered a "franchise of Al Qaeda."
These rooms could be GREAT!
“Dwight Holton has called our voter-approved law a ‘train wreck’ and is campaigning on his plan to gut it. Holton is openly disrespectful of Oregon voters, and hostile to medical-marijuana patients and providers. He would be a disaster as attorney general.
Day 22: Do you have a song or songs that make you think of your child(ren)
Overall Height: 8.25"
Passages from the Encyclicals of Pope Leo XIII on Church and State including the rights of the citizens and the duties of Catholic politicians have been quoted in the Catholic blogosphere.
Sentiment and surrounding Stamps: SU Cottage Garden stamped in SU Marina Mist
I’m stealing a line from a song title today–the famous “Rainy Days and Mondays” by The Carpenters, 1971. Can’t you just hear the tune in your head now? If you can, then I can assure you that it’s probably going to be playing in there a long time! Or at least that’s what happens to me when I am reminded of a song I like–the lyrics and music dance in my brain for hours at a time before fading away, often to appear again when I am trying to fall asleep in the middle of the night. Curses! My brother calls this phenomena ‘ear worms’…an image I actually don’t even like to think about!
It is nearly impossible to engender the necessary confidence, trust and loyalty a leader must possess without being fully engaged. A leader spends as much time out of the confines of the office engaging in real conversation with people as they do in their office planning, decision-making and organizing. Whether in person, over the phone, via email, through the social web, or even by sending a good old fashion “thank you” note – be an engaging conversationalist.
This book presents and discusses the economic and trade relations between the United States, Canada and Mexico. Topics discussed include Canada-U.S. relations; the United States-Canada trade and economic relationship; NAFTA and the future of commercial trucking across the Mexican border and the Cuban migration to the United States.
untying the king, they sent him on his way.
Writers write.
I’m not prepared for the breaking down of my best friend, for the suffering and slow burn of flames licking at all she holds dear, her light and her laughter and her little family, her safe haven and her confidence. I’m not sure if I’m willing to drag her through this with me.
Oh, and thanks, Nikka, for the heads up.
I guess I'll start with the name in the address bar. For a while now (at least ten years) I've been working on a fantasy series that has recently become more serious to me. One of the main plot devices is a dream world. So, when I went to use the restroom at a truckstop one day and saw this written on the inside of one of the stalls in permanent marker, I knew I had to incorporate it into my story. Now I have a character who manufactures dreams and I am one step closer to getting this story off the ground.
How can I do that? Did you happen to read my entry from yesterday? It goes along quite well with this thought. I must practice three things: justice, mercy and humility. All three are admirable traits in royalty. Isn’t it what you envision when you think of a king, queen, prince or princess?
The tan color deepened to brown and spread around me. To my astonishment, the area of color developed, like a photo, into a vision of a man with chocolate-brown skin. He superimposed himself over the left side of my face and upper chest and my left arm, and I perceived him as if from the inside and the outside at the same time. I could actually see him, with technicolor clarity, something that had never, ever happened to me before. He looked to be in his mid-thirties, with very round cheeks and prominent eyes, a little like Louis Armstrong. I heard the name “Bertram.”
I rarely bake with apricots but I saw a gluten-free recipe that sounded amazing and one I had to test out asap. In fact, I think this is the one and only apricot recipe on Lemon Drop to date.
What makes those claims of a coup d’tat by Najib and Hanif most ridiculous is that both of them ignored the fact that six local pressmen and about 12 photographers and journalists from the foreign media were reportedly assaulted during the fracas on April 28 Bersih 3.0 rally by police.
4. I want to be more organized... I know it helps my students to be too but just the thought of changing things (or in my case buying things) doesn't make organization sound very fun!!
The French have been particularly explicit in their imperial intentions regarding the Middle East and Africa:
Got any fav spring cleaning tips?
and powerful!)
The bike training that the children are doing came next, Herr B couldn't resist the opportunity to comment that some of the bikes (that'll be 2 English kids then at least) don't have kick down bike stands and have to be leant up against the wall, damn! Good job schools have walls eh? I refuse as a matter of principle to put a bike stand on Jas's bike (sorry Jas) and if next year when the local cop in charge of bike testing doesn't pass the bike because of it's lack of a stand then so be it, to date there's no legal requirement for bikes to have stands to make them roadworthy therefore our bikes will be standless and I shall stand my ground on that one.
Another obscurity worth digging out, as you fight your way past Be Bop A Lula '62 and Be Bop A Lula '69, is Our Souls (try saying it fast) from his final album, apparently written by his father-in-law. Always the lonesome fugitive, it was Vincent's kiss-off to a world that he must felt had it in for him.
God word is True not because it worked for me but because it is TRUTH.
African Partnership for Sexual and Reproductive Health and Rights of Women and Girls (AMANITARE) Now based in South Africa, since 2000 AMANITARE has worked to advance the rights of African women, irrespective of difference, based on the principle of bodily integrity
speeding road warrior coming in from behind this group of
Jaleel (Urkel) is quickly becoming one of my favourites. He had a bounce back week, performing the SOCKS off his cha-cha adding boatloads of personality. He also had a new easy quality that made the dance look effortless. Great scores, great dance, great week for Urkel.
STATUS: Davis files Motion to Consolidate with Sherrod v. Breitbart on March 23, 2012.
What spacecraft, what weapon
Now, this might sound all pretty straightforward, but Mieville’s innovation is the locale. Beszel and Ul Qoma aren’t neighboring cities like East and West Berlin, or Buda and Pest. Their streets and buildings literally co-occupy the same space. This creates an environment in which citizens of one city are required to “unsee” and “unhear” the citizens of the other, even though they might be walking down the same street or sitting on the same park bench. Monitoring everyone from both cities is the (almost) all-seeing secret police, Breach, which ruthlessly “disappears” offenders that break the rules of separation.
Taybank Studio, Ayr, Scotland 1978-09-04
Condiments I had not witnessed being added to beer in the college bar scene and a practice I don't see much of, if at all, when Furry Husband and I go out to eat, which isn't often. We do most of our drinking at home, a glass of wine with dinner. Our alcohol choices these days are bottled, microbrew beers and wine.
Right - that's your lot, i'm keeping this one short and sweet this week (well, as short as Moi could manage anyway!).
“Our results suggest that long-term meditators have white-matter fibers that are either more numerous, more dense or more insulated throughout the brain,” Dr. Luders said in a statement to the media. “We also found that the normal age-related decline of white-matter tissue is considerably reduced in active meditation practitioners.”
Grant funds will be made available on a competitive basis for two types of grants:
3. Ensure that the employee is benefited with training relevant to his or her field of work. Delegation and empowerment with new work responsibilities will help the employee achieve greater career development. The personnel will gain a high level of skills and knowledge by enrolling them in individual training courses as well as in team building exercises.
Other optional fillings: Chinese sausage, pickled vegetables, salty egg yolk.
But now let's get back to the fish at the top of this post. I didn't really make any resolutions per se this year, but I did decide I should try to cook and eat more fish. So good for you! So tasty! So many different fish to try!
We come from the land of the ice and snow,
Hello again! Just another quick update to keep you all up to speed.
7) Pew for One: How Is the Church Responding to Growing Number of Singles? The church needs to re-evaluate its relationship with singles, especially in light of the increasing numbers of unmarried adults.
Sickness: social status accorded to the ill person by society
Opening the door and being greeted by Bug holding a bouquet of flowers for me on the day of my biopsy. Apparently he told everyone at the shop that the flowers were "for my mommy because she got a shot."
The two women were tied up and their heads covered up with towels while the mission was looted for valuables.
Audrey subsequently suffered a heart attack, brought on in part by the stress of dealing with her feud with David over the ownership of what was formerly her hair salon. She had earlier signed over her interest in the salon to David, as she intended to elope with Lewis Archer (Nigel Havers) and to buy a hotel in Greece. She now wants the salon back.
North Carolina
Question 3: You have the opportunity to name the next world-changing religious figure anything you want; would sell that privilege to highest bidder? If so, would you think your soul to be eternally damned?
Whisk together sugar, flour, cocoa, baking powder, baking soda and salt in large bowl. Add eggs, milk, oil and vanilla. Beat on medium speed of mixer for 2 minutes. Stir in boiling water (or coffee of espresso). Fill muffin tins 2/3 full. (I only got 22 cupcakes.)
Having a good reputation is something you want in the music business. It sounds like obvious good advice for artists to tell them to be able to play well with others, but this also needs to include others you might not like or want to play with. In todays music business, you may come across and have to work with people you don’t like, they might be doing things you cant stand, but bashing them excessively online or around others is not going to help you get what you want in the end.
Montana is the latest establishment in the ever-growing stable of cool-kid haunts owned and operated by Paris graffiti artist-turned-entrepreneur, Monsieur André. He’s made a packet for himself by buying up interesting old bars and turning them into dens of beautiful-people iniquity. He launched his Paris bar empire with Le Baron, in the 8th arrondissement, a former brothel that, about four years ago became the place to see, be seen and dance ironically to hits of the 80s.
Come Saturday, no matter what, I WILL be back in the craft room making a card .... any card ... even a one-layer-card. It may take extra effort to find all the needed supplies since everything is just tossed willy-nilly in there, but I refuse to go another weekend without crafting in my own space. So that will be my end goal for this week: make one card in remodeled craft room. How hard that that be? Really? LOL LOL
Kaputt is a total curveball from an artist who had previously been in danger of settling too comfortably into a familiar style. Dan Bejar's albums as Destroyer had been yielding diminishing returns in recent years, and it had begun to seem like he was going to keep mining the same basic territory until everyone who once loved his quirky, urbane, complex pop grew bored of the stagnation. Instead, he's turned to an out-of-favor style from the past, swathing his songs in reverb-heavy lite-jazz and balearic pop atmospheres, recalling the crude synth presets and shimmering, plastic production of early 80s radio pop. It's a daring reinvention, and what initially might seem like a gimmick soon reveals itself, over multiple listens, as a brilliant aesthetic maneuver. Bejar's usually spiky voice is smoothed out to fit the glistening musical backdrops, and the album glides by so effortlessly that Bejar's characteristic wit has a chance to sneak up on the listener for once. The music is sad and sweet, and there's a lonely nostalgic feeling built into Bejar's trip to the musical past. Horns echo within the mix, surrounded with reverb to impart a feeling of distance, as though the trumpeter is miles away, intoning lonely notes into a void. Bejar is taking music often thought of as kitschy and dated and reconstructing it as haunting downer pop, revealing the loneliness and emptiness lurking behind the party gloss and disco gleam. Because of the subtlety of it all, and the initial impression of surface slickness, it's a real grower of an album that only parcels out its secrets slowly, gradually accumulating emotional depth and intensity until the kitschy surface style seems like the most natural possible way of capturing these dark, secret feelings. [buy]
13. Good Times Roll
And the thing I am most proud of: I reupholstered my dining chairs. To be fair, the last one's seat pad is not yet reattached. After finishing three chairs Friday, I couldn't sleep because the muscles in my hands were quite literally on FIRE. I hearkened back to the days when I used to work out to the tune of retired military personnel "motivation," and I realize I never hurt that badly. But check this out:
But, a year later, despite significant additional casualties, the vulnerability of the Snatch was becoming so evident that we were to pick it up on this blog, leading in August to a review of the vehicle by then defence secretary Des Browne, and its partial replacement by the Mastiff.
She was given a citation for operating a vehicle with a prohibited alcohol content of .10 or more. She's due in court in December, facing charges of first offence operating under the influence.
During the evenings the crickets and cicadas sing. Combined with roosters, hens, ducks, wild birds, yowling skinny cats and the nightly chorus sent up by the campus's dog population this can all add up to quite the racket at bed time. Speaking of ducks, on my walk home from the office yesterday a tiny yellow duckling waddled across the open-air hallway I was threading my way through, looking lost yet determined. I hope he's found his way to safety, it's a jungle out there.
FAIR USE NOTICE
Sort of the flip side of the last post when I was wondering what we should commit ourselves to crafting as a group. What do you think you is worth some money in the Station Cash Store? What should we consider buying?
with pleads of 'can we have a snow day mama?' coming
This is a little tablerunner that is for an upcoming workshop. Wool, rick rack, cotton and appliqué . . .
Some MPs are made Ministers and are in charge of certain things, like the Home Secretary, or the Minister for Education. They are selected by the Prime Minister (who is the head of the party with the most seats, usually). The Ministers are collectively referred to as the Cabinet.
Such determination in her work life goes hand in hand with sacrifices in her social life. She often finds herself declining invites to parties or social gatherings in favour of a few more hours sewing or attending a networking event. When this happens, Judith simply reminds herself “Well they are only drinking wine, I’m not really missing out on that much”. This sort of perspective has helped her throughout her career.
I learned about Oh My Melodies from Espousal Records' Kyoungmo Kim as he updated me on the current whereabouts of the members of emo pop band I Love JH. I was instantly charmed by what I heard and returned to listen every now and then. Recently this has happened more frequently, and for reasons that will become obvious tomorrow I found the perfect opportunity to find out more about Oh My Melodies straight from the source:
Not only did I rework that original block, but I have since done more applique' work (that Scrappy Dresden Plate quilt I'm working on requires applique', as do the monthly minis for Sandy's monthly QAL) and now in charge of the design for our next guild Opportunity (raffle) Quilt for 2014. Do you know what I've chosen for us to do? You guessed it if you said, "an applique' quilt"! I'll save that whole story for another day, but for now, I want to tell you about an idea that our friend, Flo shared during our coffee group.
...Happy Birthday Pooplette! (She's four now, and we have no idea how she made it so far without us killing her.)
I have gone to doctors who thought it would be easy to take advantage of a broken girl. What they didn’t know is that this girl may be broken, but very bad tempered as well and not scared of saying “no way” while stumbling out of the room.
When you think you have everything in place, we enter phase four. It is now time to take several different exposures, some that are normal and a little over, including varying the ƒ-stop to change the focal point of the photograph.
Oh, and I almost forgot, on Halloween I’m scheduled to teach two REACH writing workshops in Fredericksburg, VA. This is an all day event followed by a drive home to pass out candy. I’m looking forward to it.
Playing guitar with the band, on the road with Pearl Jam...
